---
layout: page
title: footnotes for all books, final version
editor: julie and cristobal
---


[plant] 3.1 Cane. *Saccharum officinarum*, a large tufted perennial grass probably native to Southeast Asia and first brought to the Americas by Columbus.  

3.2 Beneath what signs to plant. Planting by the signs, also known as agricultural astrology, is a food production method that advises planting, cultivating, and harvesting crops based on moon phases and the astrological calendar.  

3.3 How the hot nectar best to christallize. The basic process of making sugar in the eighteenth century involved crushing raw sugar cane stalks to extract their juice, boiling the juice with chemical agents that would remove impurities, and then boiling it several more times to reduce it to a heavy syrup. When the syrup was close to crystallizing into sugar, it was poured into barrels or moulds that allowed liquid to drain off and the solid sugar crystals to remain behind.    

[plant] 3.6 myrtle-indolence. Myrtle (*Myrtus communis*) is an aromatic shrub native to the Mediterranean region and associated with Venus, the goddess of love. Rather than a traditional invocation of the muse, *The Sugar-Cane* begins with a muse who has been wandering and in love. Indeed, Grainger married Daniel Matthew Burt, whom he met during his transatlantic voyage to St. Kitts and who was the daughter of one of the most prominent planter families of the island, in 1759. Their daughter Louisa was born before he began composing the poem.

[people] 3.8 Ascrean Poet. Hesiod (c. 700 BCE), who was from the Greek village of Ascra in the Valley of the Muses on the eastern slope of Mt. Helicon (the sacred Mount). Contemporary of Homer and known for the *Theogony* and *Works and Days*, which is considered to have influenced Virgil's *Georgics*.  

3.9 swain. A country or farm laborer, a shepherd. A key figure in georgic poetry.  

[people] 3.11 Maro. Virgil or Publius Vergilius Maro (70-19 BCE), author of the *Eclogues*, the *Aeneid*, and the *Georgics*. A major influence on Grainger and other neo-georgic poets of the eighteenth century.  

[people] 3.12 Dyer. John Dyer (1699-1757), Welsh painter and poet. Author of the georgic poem *The Fleece* (1757), which Grainger reviewed in the *Monthly Review* (April 1757).  

[people] 3.12 Pomona's Bard. John Philips (1676-1709), English poet and author of the georgic poem *Cyder* (1708). Pomona is the Roman goddess of fruit.  

[people] 3.13 Smart. Christopher Smart (1722-1771), English poet and author of the georgic poem *The Hop-Garden* (1752).  

[people] 3.13 Sommerville. William Somerville (1675-1742), English poet and author of the georgic poem *The Chace* (1735).  

4.17 weal. Well-being, happiness, prosperity.  

[people] 4.19 Aurelius. Gilmore identifies Aurelius as George Thomas (c. 1694-1774), who was born to a planter family on the island of Antigua. Descended on his mother's side from Massachusetts Bay Governor John Winthrop, Thomas was a member of the Antiguan colonial assembly before being named Governor of Pennsylvania (1738-1747). He was Governor of the Leeward Islands from 1753 to 1766.

[people] 4.20 Imperial George. George III (1738-1820) was king of Britain from 1760 to 1820.

[people] 4.22n Lucan...Pliny...Arrian. Lucan or Marcus Annaeus Lucanus (39-65 CE) was the nephew of Seneca the younger and the author of *The Civil War*. Gaius Plinius Secondus or Pliny the Elder (23-79 CE) was the author of *Historia Naturalis*. Arrian or Lucius Flavius Arrianus (86-160 CE) was the author of various short essays and histories, including *Bithyniaca*, *Parthica*, and what is known as *Affairs of Alexander*. 

[people] 4.22n Pompey. Pompey or Gnaeus Pompeius Magnus (106-48 BCE), member of the First Triumvirate. He defeated Mithridates, King of Pontus, and established military order in the eastern provinces of the Roman empire.

[place] 4.22n Persia. Now known as Iran. At its height, the Persian Empire extended from Egypt to southwestern Asia and India. It was the traditional antagonist of ancient Greece.  

5.26 joint. As sugar cane grows, it forms segments called joints. Grainger is thus referring here to the growth of sugar cane.  

[place] 5.22n Barbary-coast. Mediterranean coastline of North Africa that runs from modern Egypt to the Atlantic Ocean and includes parts of Morocco, Algeria, Tunisia, and Libya.  

[place] 5.22n Azores...Madeiras...Canary...Cape-Verd Islands...throve exceedingly. The Azores, Madeiras, Canary Islands, and Cape Verde Islands are groups of islands in the eastern Atlantic Ocean relatively close to the coasts of Europe and Africa. They often served as waystations for Europeans voyaging from Europe or Africa to the Americas. As Grainger remarks, sugar cane was introduced by the Spanish and Portuguese to these islands in the fifteenth century. The sugar plantations that were established there became models for the ones that were subsequently established in the Caribbean.  
 
[place] 5.22n Greater or Lesser Antilles. "Antilles" refers to the islands of the Caribbean and is often used as a substitute for "West Indies." The Greater Antilles are the large islands on the northwest end of the archipelago (Cuba, Jamaica, Hispaniola, and Puerto Rico).  The Lesser Antilles (further split into the Windward and Leeward Islands) are the islands ranging from the Virgin Islands in the north to Grenada in the south. St. Kitts is one of the Leeward Islands in the Lesser Antilles.

[people] 5.22n Ferdinand the Catholic. King Ferdinand V of Castile and León and II of Aragon (1452-1516), husband of Queen Isabella of Castille and patron with Isabella of Christopher Columbus' 1492 voyage.  

[place] 5.22n St. Domingo. Hispaniola, the island that includes the modern nations of Haiti and the Dominican Republic.  

5.22n *4 l. per C.* wt. Four pounds per hundredweight. A hundredweight (equivalent to 112 lbs) was a standard measure for commerce. £4 had the purchasing power of approximately forty days of wages for a skilled tradesman (see http://www.nationalarchives.gov.uk/currency-converter/).  

[place] 5.22n East-Indies. The whole of Southeast Asia to the east of and including India.  

[plant] 6.34 wild red cedar. Most likely *Cedrela odorata*, an important timber tree found in Central and South America, as well as in the Caribbean. Now considered vulnerable due to unsustainable levels of harvesting.  

[plant] 6.34 locust. The locust bean tree or carob tree (*Ceratonia siliqua*) is native to Mediterranean Europe, North Africa, the Middle East, and Turkey but now spread widely over the world. It is the source of carob, which is used in food applications, including as a chocolate substitute.  

[place] 6.22n. Guiana. Aggregate name for the colonies located along the northern coast of South America between the mouth of the Orinoco River (in modern Venezuela) and the mouth of the Amazon (in Brazil). Also included parts of Guyana, Suriname, and French Guiana. Colonizers included Portugal, France, the Netherlands, England, and Spain.  

6.22n treaty of Breda. The treaty of Breda (1667) concluded the Anglo-Dutch War between England, the Netherlands, France, and Denmark. The treaty formalized a major reorganization of colonial power, with the English taking control of New York, New Jersey, Antigua, and Montserrat; the Dutch gaining control of Surinam; and the French reclaiming Acadia in Atlantic Canada. Significantly for *The Sugar-Cane*, the treaty restored the French and British partition of St. Kitts.  

[place] 6.22n Leeward Islands. Leeward is a nautical term meaning sheltered from the wind (i.e., downwind). The Leeward Islands include the British and US Virgin Islands, Anguilla, St. Martin, St. Barthélemy, Barbuda, St. Eustatius, Saba, St. Kitts, Nevis, Antigua, Montserrat, Guadeloupe, and Dominica.  

[people] 6.22n Chaucer. Geoffrey Chaucer (1340-1400), author of *The Canterbury Tales*. Gilmore notes that Chaucer uses sugar twice in *The Canterbury Tales* and again in *Troilus and Criseyde*.

[plant] 6.34n white and red [cedar]. The white cedar is probably *Tabebuia heterophylla*, a timber tree widely distributed throughout the Caribbean.  

[plant] 6.34n cedars cultivated in the Bermudas. The Bermuda cedar (*Juniperus bermudiana*). Endemic to Bermuda and used for building houses and other construction work. Also sustained a ship-building industry that denuded the island of most of its Bermuda cedars by the 1830s.  

[plant] 7.36 cassia. Most likely *Cassia fistula*, commonly used as a purgative. It is most likely native to India and Sri Lanka, and its native range may also include other parts of South and Southeast Asia.  

[plant] 7.36 ceiba. *Ceiba pentandra*, also known as the kapok or silk-cotton tree. The ceiba, whose native range is Mexico and the tropical Americas, can achieve a height of fifty meters. To the Maya, the ceiba was a sacred tree whose roots connected the underworld to the human and upper worlds.  

[plant] 7.37 guava. Fruit from the small tree *Psidium guajava*, probably native to Central and South America but naturalized throughout the Caribbean by the eighteenth century.   

[plant] 7.37 guaiac. Refers to *Guaiacum officinale* or *Guaiacum sanctum*, both of which have native ranges that include the Caribbean. In the eighteenth century, the guaiac tree also was known as lignum vitae ("wood of life") because it was used to treat a variety of diseases, including syphilis and yaws. Also widely believed to be an abortifacient. Both *Guaiacum officinale* and *Guaiacum sanctum* are now endangered due to overexploitation and habitat loss.   

7.37n. diaphoretic. Having the property of inducing or promoting perspiration.

7.37n worms. Grainger is referring to parasitic worms (helminths) that live in the digestive tracts of humans and other animals. There are many such parasites, including tapeworms and roundworms. Worms were a major health concern in the eighteenth century, producing such physical effects as malnutrition and anemia, as well as cognitive problems.

[people] 7.37n Acosta. José de Acosta (1539-1600), Jesuit theologian, philosopher, and missionary who traveled to and spent several years in Peru and Mexico. Chiefly known for his *Historia natural y moral de las Indias* (1590), one of the earliest and most comprehensive surveys of the Americas.  

[plant] 8.44 shaddoc. A citrus fruit (*Citrus maxima*) also known as the pomelo or pummelo. Native to Southeast Asia and known as the shaddock in the eighteenth century because it was supposedly brought to the Caribbean by an Englishman named Captain Shaddock.  

[plant] 8.44 forbidden fruit. Refers to species of *Citrus* (family Rutaceae) that are now virtually extinct. It is similar in taste to the orange and the shaddock, and it is closely related to the grapefruit (Kumamoto et al., Bowman et al., Higman 180).   

[plant] 8.45 acajou. The cashew or cashewnut tree (*Anacardium occidentale*). Its native range is Trinidad to tropical South America. The fruit is caustic and was supposedly used by women as a chemical peel to remove freckles (Riddell 82-83). Also see Grainger's footnote in Book IV, p. 132.  

[plant] 8.45 sabbaca. Avocado (*Persea americana*), which probably originated in Central America. It then spread to the Caribbean in the aftermath of the Spanish conquest of Mexico. An important part of the diets of the enslaved who had access to it: they likely harvested it from woodlands, versus growing it in provision grounds or gardens (Higman 158-160).  

[people] 8.45n Ulloa. Antonio de Ulloa y de la Torre-Giral (1716-1795) was a colonel and naval officer of the Spanish navy, as well as an explorer and scientist. He participated in a geodesic mission to the equator in Peru to measure the earth's true shape. After the mission was completed, Ulloa co-authored with Jorge Juan the *Relación histórica del viage a la América meridional* (1748).  

[plant] 8.45n two species; the one bearing a green fruit...and the other a red...and grows chiefly in Mexico. There are multiple varieties of avocado. The one that Grainger identifies as bearing a green fruit may be *Persea americana* var. *americana*, also known as the West Indian avocado. The one that Grainger identifies as growing chiefly in Mexico may be *Persea americana* var. *drymifolia*, also known as the Mexican avocado. 

8.45n butyraceous. Of the nature of butter; buttery.

[people] 8.45n Sir Hans Sloane. Hans Sloane (1660-1753), an Irish physician, naturalist, and collector who traveled to Jamaica in 1687 with Christopher Monck, second duke of Albemarle and newly appointed governor of Jamaica. During his stay in Jamaica, Sloane amassed an extensive collection of natural specimens, including plants, that later served as the basis for his natural history, *A voyage to the islands Madera, Barbados, Nieves, S. Christophers and Jamaica* (1707, 1725). Sloane also succeeded Isaac Newton as president of the Royal Society in 1727. Upon his death, he bequeathed his extensive collections, which he had made considerable additions to after returning from Jamaica, to the British nation. These served as the founding collections of the British Museum, the British Library, and the Natural History Museum in London.  

[plant] 8.45n the pear named Lady's-thighs. Also known as the jargonelle pear (*Pyrus communis* 'Jargonelle'). One of the oldest pears in cultivation.  

[plant] 8.45n *Bois d'anise*. Anise wood. The leaves of some varieties of avocado give off a scent of anise when crushed.    

9.55 dog-star. The dog star is another name for Sirius, the brightest star in the constellation Canis Major. Sirius rises in conjunction with the sun from July 3 to August 11, which are known as the "dog days" of summer.  

9.57 after-offspring. Gilmore defines after-offspring as second-growth cane that sprouts from the stumps once first-growth stalks have been cut and harvested (also known as "ratoon canes").

[place] 9.61 Tempé. The proper name of a valley in Thessaly, located between Mounts Olympus and Ossa; used as a general name for a beautiful valley or rural spot.

9.61 Arcadian Pan. God of flocks and herds of Greek mythology, usually represented with the horns, ears, and legs of a goat on the body of a man. Pan lived in Arcadia, an idealized, utopian place in mythology and literature.

9.60n "A precious stone set in the silver sea." John of Gaunt describes England as "A precious stone, set in the silver sea" in Shakespeare's *Richard II* (2.1.46).

9.60n seventeenth N.L. Seventeenth north latitude, one of the coordinates for St. Kitts.

[place] 9.60n Mount Misery. Mount Misery was the name used by Europeans for the main volcanic mountain on St. Kitts. Renamed Mt. Liamuiga when St. Kitts and Nevis became independent on 19 September 1983.

9.60n Legend of the Devil's carrying St. Christopher on his shoulders. This may refer to the legend that St. Christopher, whose name means "Christ carrier," once carried Jesus in the form of a child across a river.

[people] 9.60n Templeman's Survey. Thomas Templeman's *A New Survey of the Globe: Or, an Accurate Mensuration of all the...Countries...in the World* (1729).

[place] 10.64 Enna. City and province in central Sicily.  

[place] 10.45n St.Kitts ... Nevis. Together, these islands form the modern Federation of St. Kitts and Nevis.

10.45n Solfaterre. A volcano.  

10.45n fugitive Negroes. Runaway or escaped slaves.  

[plant] 10.45n tobacco, indigo, coffee, and cotton-plantations. Tobacco, indigo, coffee, and cotton were major agricultural commodities in the eighteenth-century Caribbean. Tobacco (*Nicotiana tabacum*) is native to the Americas. Indigo (genus *Indigofera*) is found in tropical regions throughout the world. Various species are used in the production of blue dye. Commercial cotton (genus *Gossypium*) is produced from several different species, some of which are native to the Old World and others of which are native to the New World. Coffee is made from the roasted seeds of the genus *Coffea*. *Coffea arabica*, the most widely cultivated species, is native to northeast tropical Africa.  

[people] 10.45n King James. King James II of England and Ireland and James VII of Scotland (1633–1701). Son of Charles I, James II became king of England after the death of his brother, Charles II. He was the last Roman Catholic king of England and abdicated in 1688 during the Glorious Revolution. He was succeeded by his daughter Mary II and her husband William III of Orange.

10.45n treaty of Ryswick. Also Treaty of Rijswijk, signed in 1697 and named after the Dutch city in which it was signed. The treaty ended the Nine Years' War (1689-1697), in which Louis XIV's France faced a grand coalition of England, the Holy Roman Empire, the Dutch, and Spain. The treaty confirmed the effective disappearance of Spain as a maritime and continental power.

[place] 10.45n Martinico. Spanish name for the island of Martinique, the northernmost of the Windward Islands. Now an overseas department of France.  

10.45n treaty of Utrecht. The Treaty of Utrecht (1713) was part of the general settlement ending the War of Spanish Succession (1701-1714). The treaty confirmed Philip V as King of Spain but required him to abandon his claim to the French throne. Additional provisions included the Spanish forfeiture of Gibraltar and Minorca to the British and the French forfeiture of claims to Newfoundland, Nova Scotia, and Prince Rupert's Land in northern Canada. The French also had to give the formerly partitioned St. Kitts entirely to the British. The British received the Asiento as well, a monopoly contract to supply the Spanish Americas with enslaved Africans.  

11.66 Sicilian Proserpine. The Italian name for Persephone, queen of the underworld.

11.71-72 Pluto. Roman God of the underworld who abducted Proserpine and made her his queen. 

11.85 red brick-mould. Loose and clay-like soil beneficial for cultivation.

11.86 marly beds. Marl is an earthy deposit, typically loose and consisting chiefly of clay mixed with calcium carbonate, used to improve the texture of sandy or light soil. 

12.93 keel. Poetic term for a ship or vessel.  

12.94 Daughters of Heaven. The Muses.  

[people] 12.97 Columbus. Christopher Columbus (1451-1506), a Genoese-born explorer. The purpose of his famed 1492 voyage was to discover a western route to Asia. He set sight on the island of Guanahani (in the Bahamas) on October 12. Columbus completed four voyages to the Americas during his lifetime. 

13.111 And where the magnet first its aid declin'd. Refers to magnetic declination, the deviation of a compass needle from true north.  

[people] 13.113 Iberian King. King Ferdinand II of Aragon.  

13.118 meed. Recompense, reward, gift.  

[people] 13.111n Sir Anthony Shirley. Count Sherley (1565-1635?), English adventurer and diplomat who led ill-fated expeditions against the Portuguese in Cape Verde and against the Spanish in Jamaica. He later went to Persia to engineer an alliance against the Turks.  

[place] 13.111n St. Jago de la Vega. St. Jago de la Vega (or Santiago de la Vega) was the capital of Jamaica under Spanish colonial rule and then under English colonial rule until the late nineteenth century (the English renamed it "Spanish Town"). It lies just west of Kingston, the current capital of Jamaica.  

[people] 13.111n Oliver Cromwell. Oliver Cromwell (1599–1658), lord protector of England, Scotland, and Ireland (1653-1658). One of the leaders of the English Civil War and a signatory to Charles I's death warrant. In 1655, he launched what was known as the Western Design with the intention of dislodging Spanish power in the Caribbean and establishing an English presence there. The invasion of Hispaniola was a failure, but the English expelled the Spanish from Jamaica. Cromwell died in 1658, but his remains were exhumed in 1661, at which time he was posthumously "executed."  

[people] 13.111n Sir Thomas Modyford. Sir Thomas Modyford, first baronet (c. 1620–1679), one of the founding planters of Barbados. Later governor of Jamaica (1664-1669).

[people] 13.111n King Charles. Charles II (1630-1685), king of England, Scotland, and Ireland. Son of Charles I (1600–1649) and brother of James II (1633–1701). He became king after the rule of Oliver Cromwell and the restoration of the British monarchy in 1660.

14.123 the Nine. The nine muses of art, literature, and science.  

[plant] 14.132 bearded fig. *Ficus citrifolia*, also known as the wild banyan tree. It is the national tree of Barbados, and its native range includes Florida and the tropical Americas.  

[people] 14.132n Q. Curtius. Quintus Curtius Rufus (1st century CE), Roman historian and author of *Histories of Alexander the Great*.

[people] 14.132n Milton. John Milton (1606-1674), English poet and polemicist. Especially known for *Paradise Lost* (1667) and *Samson Agonistes* (1671). Grainger quotes here from *Paradise Lost* (9.1101-1110).  

[place] 14.132n In Malabar and Decan spreads her arms. Malabar is a region on the southwest coast of India (modern Kerala). Decan refers to the Deccan plateau, immediately to the east of Kerala.  

[place] 15.133 Barbadoes. Barbados was settled by the English in 1627, and it became a British colony in 1652. Barbados gained independence in 1966.  

[place] 15.135 Mountserrat. Montserrat, a British overseas territory in the Leeward Islands.

[people] 15.132n the Earl of Carlisle. James Hay, first earl of Carlisle (c. 1580-1636), a Scottish courtier and diplomat who came to the English court with James I. In 1627, he obtained a grant from Charles I for all of the Caribbean islands ranging from Barbados to St. Kitts.  

[people] 15.132n the Earl of Marlborough. James Ley, first earl of Marlborough (1550–1629), English judge and politician and rival to the earl of Carlisle for the English Caribbean islands.  

[plant] 15.132n ginger. Ginger (*Zingiber officinale*) is probably native to India and was brought to the Caribbean by the Spanish in the sixteenth century (Higman 95).  

[place] 15.134n Bristol. City located in the southwest of England. Also one of England's most important sugar-refining cities in the eighteenth century. Although the initial steps of sugar production happened in the Caribbean, sugar was further refined in Britain before being sold to consumers there.  

15.134n Columbus’s second voyage, A. D. 1493. Columbus's second voyage took place from 1493 to 1496.  

[place] 15.135n Antigua. One of the Leeward Islands; St. Kitts lies just to the west of it. Antigua was colonized by the English in 1632 and now forms part of the nation of Antigua and Barbuda.  

16.149 glebes. Earth, lands.  

[people] 16.135n K. William and Q. Anne’s time. William III (1650–1702), king of England, Scotland, and Ireland and prince of Orange. Queen Anne (1665-1714) was the queen of England, Scotland and Ireland between 1702 and 1707. They ascended to the throne after the abdication of James II at the end of the Glorious Revolution (1688-1689).

[people] 16.135n Sir Thomas Warner. Sir Thomas Warner (c. 1580–1649), English settler and colonial governor. Was in Guiana from 1620 to 1622 before returning to England. In 1624, he settled in St. Kitts, where he established tobacco plantations and formed an alliance with the French against the Caribs. He was named Governor of St. Kitts for life by the Earl of Carlisle in 1629.  

17.175 bill. Also bill-hook. Cutlass used for cutting cane.

18.179 saccharize. The process of converting cane syrup into sugar.

18.182 wain. A wane is a large open vehicle or wagon drawn by horses or oxen and used to carry heavy loads, especially of agricultural produce.  

18.179n marble quick-lime. Lime was used in Grainger's time to refine sugar: when boiled with sugar, lime precipitates impurities.  

19.198 The "Errata" list at the end of *The Sugar-Cane* indicates that this comma should be removed.  

19.213 lily. Fleur-de-lis, a lily-shaped ornament that symbolizes France.  

[place] 19.216 Gallia. France.  

[place] 20.233 Dorchestria's plains. According to Gilmore, a Latinized name that refers to the town of Dorchester in the southern English county of Dorset.  

20.234 provender. Dried cattle feed (e.g., hay).  

[plant] 20.237 yams. One of many species of tubers within the *Dioscorea* genus. One of the most important food crops for enslaved persons in the Caribbean. There are several reasons yams became important to Afro-Caribbean diets: yam crop yields are high, yams are easily stored, and they can be prepared in several different ways. Just as crucially, yams formed a part of West African diets long before the commencement of the slave trade. As a result, slave traders often shipped large quantities of yams on trans-Atlantic voyages to feed the people on board, and yams accompanied Africans to the Americas, where they were able to continue cultivating them. Although there is one South American species of yam (*Dioscorea trifida*) that was transplanted to the Caribbean by Amerindians and consumed by subsequent inhabitants of the region, more important species to the diets of the enslaved were *Dioscorea cayenensis*, which is native to West Africa, and *Dioscorea alata*, which is native to Southeast Asia but had been introduced to the west coast of Africa by the Portuguese and Spanish by the sixteenth century (Higman 72-81).  

[plant] 20.237n water-melon, or gourd. Watermelon (*Citrullus lanatus*) is native to Egypt, Ethiopia, Libya, and Sudan.   

[plant] 21.237n boiled or roasted. Roasting and boiling are two of the easiest ways to prepare yams and were thus two methods commonly employed by the enslaved. In the eighteenth-century Caribbean, enslaved persons also regularly prepared yams by following the long-established West African practice of pounding them with a mortar and pestle until they formed a paste that could be rolled into small balls. Pounded yams were sometimes known as *fufu*, a term derived from the Twi and Ga-Adangme languages that also applied to pounded plantain and cassava (Higman 78-81).  

22.260 gemmy. Gem-like, brilliant, glittering.  

22.270 demesnes. Domains. 

22.260n junks. A gathering of stems or stalks.  

23.278 improvement. The idea of improvement has long legal and philosophical roots. For the legal context, in which it refers to the cultivation of crops that transforms wilderness into property, see John Locke's *Second Treatise on Government* (1689). Grainger uses it here in the sense of progress, a central concern of the Englightenment.  

24.311 ken. Range of vision.  

[people] 24.313 Mantuan Bard. Virgil was born in the Italian provice of Mantua.  

25.329 Amyntor. King of Thessalian Hellas and the father of Phoenix, one of Achilles's Myrmidons.  

25.330 Themis. The Greek goddess of wisdom and good counsel; often the personification of justice and the interpreter of the gods' will.  

[people] 25.334n Mr. Maupertuis. Pierre-Louis Moreau de Maupertuis (1698-1759), French mathematician, biologist, and astronomer who led an expedition to northern Finland to measure the length of a degree along the meridian.  

26.339 Harpies. Creatures in Greek mythology depicted as winged women or birds with women's faces.  

27.342 black crabs. Probably *Gecarcinus ruricola*, also known as the black land crab. One of several species of terrestrial or land crabs, the black land crab lives in damp and shaded forest areas inland and migrates in large numbers to the sea to breed. It is one of the most commonly exploited land crabs for human consumption in the Caribbean. Eighteenth-century observers were often fascinated by the mass migration of land crabs.  

27.341n guana, or rather Iguana. A family of crested lizards (order Squamata, suborder Sauria). More than seven hundred species have been identified; they are found principally in the temperate and tropical Americas. Their flesh and eggs are valued for food.  

27.341n *Lues Venerea*. *Lues venerea* was the medical term used for syphilis (also commonly known by the British as the "French pox").  

27.341n alligator. The American alligator, *Alligator mississippiensis*.  

27.342n *cholera morbus*. *Cholera morbus* is used in modern medicine to describe the water-borne disease caused by *Vibrio cholerae*. In the eighteenth century, however, it described a variety of illnesses with symptoms like diarrhea, vomiting, dehydration, and abdominal pain. 

[plant] 27.342n mahoe-berry. May be the berries from the blue mahoe (*Hibiscus elatus*), a tree whose native range is Cuba and Jamaica. Also naturalized to other parts of the Caribbean; now the national tree of Jamaica.  

28.355 Naiads. Nymphs of springs, rivers, and lakes in Greek mythology.  

[plant] 29.378 wild fig. Also known as bearded fig or the wild banyan tree (*Ficus citrifolia*).  

29.386 Phoebus. An alternate name for the Greek god Apollo and used in contexts where Apollo is identified with the sun.  

[plant] 29.393 fern-tree shades. Tree ferns are primitive plants that belong to the order Cyatheales. Grainger may have been referencing *Cyathea arborea*, sometimes known as the West Indian treefern, which can grow up to nine meters tall.  

30.396 linen lightly wrapt. The enslaved generally were provided with a coarse brown linen known as osnaburg.  

30.397 Iris. In Greco-Roman mythology, Iris was the daughter of the Titan Thaumas and the Oceanid Electra; she is sometimes cited as the wife of Zephyrus, the west wind. Her name in Greek means rainbow. The goddess Juno took her to serve as her handmaid.  

30.407 the shield was forg'd for Peleus' Son. Peleus' son is Achilles. In Book 18 of the *Iliad*, the god Hephaestus forges an elaborate shield for Achilles to replace the armor that was lost when Hector killed Patroclus.    

31.416 Procyon. Alpha Canis Minoris, the brightest star in the constellation Canis Minor.

31.417 yet the fiery Sun in Leo rides. Leo is the fifth sign of the zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-July and exits it in mid-August.  

[plant] 31.418 anana. The pineapple (*Ananas comosus*) originated in Central or South America. It was brought by Amerindians to the Caribbean (Higman 188).  

31.425 the arrow's deadening power. Refers to Sagittarius, the southern zodiacal constellation depicted as a centaur aiming an arrow; popularly known as the Archer. By "the arrow's deadening power," Grainger means the November cold. Sagittarius is the ninth sign of the zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-November and exits it in mid-December.  

[plant] 31.427 lemon, orange, and the lime. Members of the genus *Citrus*. Citrus fruits originated in Southeast Asia and spread from there to the Mediterranean and Spain. Columbus brought sour oranges (*Citrus aurantium*), sweet oranges (*Citrus sinensis*), limes (*Citrus aurantifolia*), and citrons (*Citrus medica*) to the Caribbean. He probably also carried lemons (*Citrus limon*) (Higman 175).  

[plant] 31.430 yellow plantanes. Plantains (family Musaceae) are closely related to the banana, and they both formed an important part of the diets of the enslaved (although plantains were more important than bananas). Wild species of plantain and banana originated from and were first cultivated in ancient Southeast Asia, but cultivated species reached Africa in prehistoric times. They were then introduced to Spain by the tenth century and the Canary Islands by the fifteenth. They subsequently were introduced to the Caribbean by the Spanish (Higman 134).    

31.432 'Till Capricorn command. Capricorn is the tenth sign of the zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-December and exits it in mid-January.  

31.433 moist Aquarius melt. Aquarius is the eleventh sign of the zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-January and exits it in mid-February.  

[plant] 31.418n cherimoya. *Annona cherimola*, a fruit that originated in South America and is perhaps native to Ecuador.  

[plant] 31.418n wild pine-apple, or ananas bravo. *Bromelia pinguin*. Its native range is Mexico and the tropical Americas.  

32.453 moon must blunt her horns. The pointed ends of the crescent moon are sometimes referred to as its horns. Grainger thus means that six moons or months must pass.  

33.459 alien. Belonging to another person, place, or family; from elsewhere, foreign.  

33.472 stern Neptune. Roman god of the sea.  

34.483 from Aries to the Bull. Aries is the first sign of the zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-March and exits it in mid-April. The Bull refers to the zodiacal sign of Taurus, which is the second sign of the zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-April and exits it in mid-May.  

34.484 the Virgin his hot beams inflame. The Virgin names Virgo, the sixth sign of the zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-August and exits it in mid-September.  

34.488 wondering daughters of the main. Sea nymphs. Chiefly used in poetry, "main" denotes the ocean.  

34.489 ere Libra weigh the year. Libra is the seventh sign of the zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-September and exits it in mid-October.  

34.495 Unfailing herbage to thy toiling herds. Cane stalks often provided cattle with feed.  

34.482n *Seasons* in the West-Indies. In the Caribbean, seasons are generally divided into wet and dry, versus the four seasons commonly known in temperate zones.    

[plant] 35.503 logwood-hedge. Logwood is the commercial product of a tree (*Haematoxylum campechianum*) indigenous to Belize and the southeastern coast of the Gulf of Campeche and the Yucatan Peninsula in Mexico. A source of the dye substance haematoxylin, which produces blue, red, and purple colors.  

35.505 the flux...Endemial ail. The flux is a general term for gastrointestinal disorders like dysentery (also known as the "bloody flux"). Dysentery remained a major public health concern throughout the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries. Endemial means endemic or habitually present in a certain country or area.  

35.500n Saracens. Among the later Greeks and Romans, a name for the nomadic peoples of the Syro-Arabian desert; also used as a synonym for Arab and Muslim peoples.  

[plant] 35.508 ricinus. Grainger refers here to the physic nut plant (*Jatropha curcas*), which is often conflated with the castor oil plant (*Ricinus communis*). The physic nut tree is native to the tropical Americas. It is toxic to human beings and livestock and was often used as a purgative in the eighteenth century. The castor oil plant is probably native to northeastern Africa.  

[people] 35.508n Ray. John Ray (1627-1705), English naturalist and botanist. Author of *Historia plantarum* (1686-1704), a three-volume encyclopedia of plants cataloging 18,600 species.

[plant] 35.508n The species of it which bears red coral-like flowers is named *Bellyach* by the Barbadians. The bellyache bush (*Jatropha gossypiifolia*) has a native range that includes Mexico and the tropical Americas.  

35.508n melancholy. Prior to the eighteenth century, melancholy was understood within the framework of humoral theories of the body (articulated by Aristotle, Galen, and Hippocrates) as a disease caused by an excess of "black bile" and characterized by such emotions as fear or sadness without explicit cause. Use of the term had expanded by the time of Grainger's writing to speak more generally of physiological disturbance, listlessness, or dejection.  

36.509. cholic. Also colic or painful stomach contractions.

[plant] 36.510 acassee. Probably the sweet acacia (*Acacia farnesiana*), also known as the West Indian black-thorn. 

36.511. Jewry, stiff-neck'd race. The book of Exodus contains a passage referring to Israelites as a "stiff-necked people" (32: 9). The passage refers to the refusal of those accompanying Moses out of Egypt to give up their worship of idols. Yet the passage also has been cited by those seeking to characterize the Jewish people as obstinate for refusing to accept Christianity. As such, it has anti-Semitic dimensions, in that it suggests that Judaism's followers are sinful and fundamentally flawed, as well as attached to an inferior religion.   
[plant] 36.515 privet. Refers to any of a number of shrubs belonging to the genus *Ligustrum*. Native to Europe, North Africa, and Asia; commonly used for hedging. Some species are invasive.  

[place] 36.517. Grampia's piny hills. The Grampian Mountains in Scotland.  

[people] 36.510n. Tournefort. Joseph Pitton de Tournefort (1656-1708), French physician and botanist, author of *Éléments de botanique* (1694).

[plant] 36.520 carnation. *Caesalpinia pulcherrima*, a shrub that produes showy orange and yellow flowers with red stamens. It was known in the colonial period as *Poinciana pulcherrima*, Barbados Pride, and peacock flower, among other names, most referring to the plant's beauty (the Latin word *pulcher* means beauty). From the seventeenth century, Europeans reported that it was being used by Amerindian and African women in the Americas as an abortifacient: Maria Sibylla Merian (1647-1717), a Dutch naturalist and artist who traveled to Surinam in the seventeenth century, also claimed that women used the plant to induce abortions because they did not want to give birth to children who would be enslaved (2.124-125). The origins of the plant are unclear: some botanists believe it to be native to Asia and an early introduction to the Caribbean, while others believe it to be native to the tropical Americas.   

[people] 36.520n Depoinci. General Philippe de Lonvilliers, chevalier de Poincy (1584-1660), governor of the French Antilles from 1647 to 1660.  

[plant] 36.520n senna kind. The genus *Senna* contains various plants native to the Old and New World tropics that have laxative effects.  

36.520n stomachic. Good for the stomach.  

36.520n carminative. Having the quality of expelling flatulence.  

36.520n emmenagogue. Having the power to induce menstrual flow.  

36.520n *Cauda pavonis*. Peacock's tail.  

36.520n *Flower Fence*. Another common name for *Caesalpinia pulcherrima* because it was frequently used as a flowering barrier fence.

[place] 36.520n Guinea. A region on the west coast of Africa that served as a center of the Atlantic slave trade. It included parts of modern Sierra Leone, Liberia, Côte d'Ivoire, Ghana, Togo, Benin, Nigeria, and Cameroon but is not to be confused with the modern nation of Guinea on the western coast of Africa.  

37.524 Juno's bird. Juno has been associated with geese (family Anatidae) and peacocks (three species in the pheasant family Phasianidae).  

37.526. humming bird. Birds of the family Trochilidae.  

37.529. bird of Jove. An eagle (family Accipitridae). 

[people] 37.534. Vitruvius. Vitruvius Pollio (1st century BCE), Roman architect.

[plant] 37.536 prickly pear. Common name for cactus plants of the genus *Opuntia*, which contains over a hundred species that are distributed throughout the Americas. *Opuntia* was of significant interest to European naturalists and others concerned with the Americas because some species served as food plants for the cochineal insect (*Dactylopius coccus*), the source of a highly prized red dye. The cochineal insect is native to tropical and subtropical Mexico and South America and was used in those places in the precolonial era to dye textiles and other objects. 

[people] 37.526n. Edwards. George Edwards (1694-1773), English artist and ornithologist. Author of *A Natural History of Uncommon Birds* (1743-1751).  

[plant] 38.538 wild liquorice. *Abrus precatorius*, a slender, viny plant that produces scarlet, pea-sized seeds with small black spots at the points of attachment. The seeds are known as jumbee beads, while the plant is sometimes known as the rosary pea. The seeds are commonly used to make jewelry, and they have been associated with the practice of obeah, perhaps because the black spots on the seeds resemble eyes. The seeds also may have been used to heal or poison since they contain the toxin abrin, which can induce nausea, vomiting, abdominal cramping, diarrhea, and dehydration. *Abrus precatorius* is native to Africa, Asia, Malesia, Australia, and the Pacific region.  

38.543. Vermeil. Bright red color.

38.544. Christobelle. Gilmore suggests that Christobelle refers to Grainger's wife, Daniel Matthew Burt. This seems likely, especially if one reads "Christobelle" as "Belle of St. Christopher." Lines 544-547 refer to Grainger's long-standing wish that he might one day own his own plantation. See, for example, his 25 March 1765 letter to Bishop Thomas Percy (Nichols 288).  

38.536n The former is sometimes eaten, but the other seldom. The fruits and pads of *Opuntia* cacti have constituted an important food source for human beings and animals.  

38.536n fucus. A paint or cosmetic for beautifying the skin; a wash or coloring for the face.  

[plant] 38.536n It grows naturally in some parts of Spain. *Opuntia ficus-indica*, which is native to Mexico, was introduced to Spain by Christopher Columbus upon his return from his first voyage.  

38.536n. scymitar. A scimitar is a short, curved, single-edged sword associated primarily with Turkey or the Middle East.  

38.538n scandent. Climbing, ascending.  

[plant] 38.538n. pigeon-peas. *Cajanus cajan*. Pigeon pea is a drought-resistant crop that historically has been important for small-scale farmers in semi-arid areas. It was commonly grown in the provision grounds or gardens of the enslaved because it could survive without much water or attention. It is native to South Asia and was first domesticated in India. By 2000 BCE, it also was being cultivated in East Africa, from where it was brought to the Americas, most likely as a result of the slave trade.   

38.538n. emetic...pectoral. An emetic is a medicine that excites vomiting. Pectoral drinks aid in digestion.

[plant] 38.538n black ebony. Ebony refers to various Asian and African trees of the genus *Diospyros* in the ebony family (Ebenaceae). Historically, ebony wood has been valued for its dark color and used to make furniture, ornaments, and other objects.  

39.559 contagious blast. Gilmore identifies the blast as the disease that also has been called the black blight. It results from an infestation by the West Indian cane fly (*Saccharosydne saccharivora*).  

39.560. Dryad. Wood or tree nymph in Greek mythology.  

39.564. recks. Heeds, cares, minds, considers.  

40.572. yellow death. Yellow fever, a disease transmitted by the *Aedes aegypti* mosquito, occurs mostly in tropical climates and is characterized by jaundice, fever, nausea or vomiting, and aches. This urban disease was extremely deadly to newcomers from Europe.

40.580. Montano. Grainger continues the next few pages describing Montano, a fictional planter whom he lauds for treating his slaves humanely. It should be noted that this behavior, though presented as virtuous, is justified on economic grounds.  

40.572n Creoles. In the eighteenth century, the term creole was used to refer to individuals born in the Americas, regardless of ancestry.  

[plant] 41.596 cassada. Cassava (*Manihot esculenta*), also known as manioc, yuca, and bitter cassava, which was domesticated in South America thousands of years ago and then brought to the Caribbean islands by Amerindians. One of the most important food sources for Amerindians during the precolonial era; subsequently adopted by Africans and Europeans in the Caribbean as well. Nevertheless, cassava is highly poisonous: its roots, which are the parts of the plant that are prepared for consumption, contain cyanide, and the raw root is poisonous to human beings. Cassava has advantages that offset its toxic nature, however: it can grow in poor soils and conditions, one planting produces several harvests, and the roots can be stored in the ground for a long time without spoiling. The root's poison also can be neutralized by proper processing: Amerindians and other early Caribbean consumers usually processed cassava root by grating it and then pressing the poisonous juice out of it to make a flour, which could be eaten as a porridge or turned into various cakes or breads (Higman 61-69).  

[plant] 41.597 tanies. Tanies were roots commonly consumed by enslaved Africans because they were easy to cultivate and had a high yield. The tanie, tannia, or yautia is technically the species *Xanthosoma sagittifolium*, but it was often confused with taro or eddo (*Colocasia esculenta*), another common root crop cultivated by the enslaved. *Xanthosoma sagittifolium* has a native range extending from Costa Rica to tropical South America. *Colocasia esculenta* originated in southeastern or southern Central Asia but was being cultivated in Africa by 100 CE. From there, it was brought to the Americas on slave ships, which stocked it as food (Higman 82-86).  

[plant] 41.596n. a species of cassada which may be eat with safety, without expressing the juice; this the French call *Camagnoc*. Cultivated varieties of cassava are classed into two groups: sweet and bitter. Sweet cassava is not poisonous and can be eaten without the processing that bitter cassava requires. Although it is more dangerous to eat, bitter cassava historically has been cultivated more than sweet cassava, perhaps because it has a higher yield and because it makes a better flour (Higman 62).   

[people] 41.596n. A wholesome drink is prepared from this root by the Indians, Spaniards, and Portuguese, according to Pineda. There are reports from the colonial Caribbean of cassava being made into a drink called perino (Higman 69). Pineda is Francisco Núñez de Pineda y Bascuñá (1607-1680), author of *Cautiverio feliz y razón individual de las guerras dilatadas del reino de Chile* (finished 1672).  

[plant] 41.596n. one species of this plant which the Indians only use, and is by them called *Baccacoua*. Jean Antoine Bruletout de Préfontaine's *Maison rustique, à l'usage des habitans de la partie de la France équinoxiale connue sous le nom de Cayenne* (1763) also mentions a kind of cassava called Baccacoua that is consumed only by the Amerindians in Cayenne, a French colony on the northeastern coast of South America (now the name of the capital of French Guiana).  

41.597n. The young leaves, as well as the spiral stalks which support the flower, are eaten by Negroes as a salad. Tannia and taro leaves were primarily consumed by the enslaved because they contained needle-like crystals of calcium oxalate. These crystals irritated the mouth and throat when eaten, and the leaves had to be boiled for a long period of time to reduce what was known as the "scratching" effect (Higman 86-87).  

[people] 42.599. Raleigh's pungent plant. Sir Walter Raleigh (1554-1618), an English courtier during Queen Elizabeth I's reign, as well as an explorer and author who obtained a patent for and helped to organize the expeditions to Roanoke in 1585 and 1587. He set out for South America in 1595, exploring the Orinoco River in present-day Venezuela, and again in 1617 to search for the famed city of El Dorado. He was executed for treason in 1618. Raleigh is the author of *Discoverie of the Large, Rich, and Bewtiful Empyre of Guiana* (1596) and is associated with the introduction of tobacco to England (his "pungent plant").  

[plant] 42.598 soursop. The soursop (*Annona muricata*) is a fruit of tropical American origin.  

[plant] 42.601 cotton-shrub. Commercial cotton (genus *Gossypium*) is produced from several different species, some of which are native to the Old World and others of which are native to the New World.  

[plant] 42.605 cacao-walk. A grove of cacao trees. The cacao tree (*Theobroma cacao*) is the source of chocolate, which is made from the seeds of the cacao tree. Cacao is native to Central and South America and was first cultivated by Amerindians thousands of years ago. Europeans first encountered cacao in Mexico, where the Aztecs placed a high value on it: cacao was prepared into chocolate drinks that were consumed by the Aztec elite, as well as during religious rituals, and cacao seeds were used as currency and tribute. Cacao was first brought to the Caribbean by Spaniards, who established plantations to supply Europe with chocolate. Although some Europeans initially found the taste of chocolate off-putting (the Aztecs did not add sugar to their chocolate), it was being consumed in Europe in significant quantities by the seventeenth century.  

[plant] 42.598n custard, star, and sugar-apples. Custard apple (*Annona reticulata*) is the fruit of a tree whose native range is Mexico to northeastern Venezuela. The star apple (*Chrysophyllum cainito*) is the fruit of a tree native to the Greater Antilles (Higman 202). Sugar apple (*Annona squamosa*), also known as sweetsop, is the fruit of a tree native to lowland Central America.  

[place] 42.601n. Levant. Refers to the eastern part of the Mediterranean; includes modern Turkey, Syria, Lebanon, Jordan, Israel, and Egypt.    

[people] 42.601n. Martinus. According to Gilmore, Matthias Martinius (1572—1630), author of *Lexicon Philologicum* (1623).  

43.607. Danae...Theodosia, thine. Gilmore suggests that these names reference Grainger's wife, whose first name was Daniel ("Daniel" sounds like "Danae").  

[plant] 43.605n the addition of vanellas and other hot ingredients. The Aztecs flavored their chocolate with vanilla (*Vanilla planifolia*), which is native to Mexico and Belize, as well as other spices, including chili peppers (genus *Capsicum*), which have a native range that includes Mexico and the tropical Americas. Grainger was not necessarily thinking of the spiciness of ingredients when he referred to them as "hot," however. He may instead have meant that vanilla, pepper, and other spices were hot in a humoral sense: according to humoral theories of health, all foods possessed elemental qualities that reflected some combination of heat, moisture, coldness, or dryness. These foods could, in turn, impart those qualities to those who ate them and thus needed to be regulated to complement the humoral properties of consumers' bodies, which also were hot, cold, moist, or dry.  

[plant] 43.605n olive. The olive tree (*Olea europaea*) is widely distributed across the Mediterranean region, Africa, and Asia and has been cultivated in the Mediterranean for over five thousand years.    

[plant] 43.605n *Madre de Cacao*. *Gliricidia sepium*. Its native range includes Mexico, Central America, and South America, and it is used as a shade tree for cacao and other plants.  

43.605n good pods. Cacao trees produce large pods that contain the cacao seeds, also known as cacao beans or nuts.  

[plant] 43.605n cucumber. The cucumber (*Cucumis sativus*) has a native range extending from Himalaya to north Thailand.  

43.605n There are three or four sorts of cacao, which differ from one another in the colour and goodness of their nuts. That from the Caraccas is certainly the best. There are three main varieties of cacao used in commercial chocolate production today: the Forastero, the Trinitario, and the Criollo. The Criollo is the most prized variety and probably the one Grainger was referencing, since it is still grown today in Venezuela (Caracas is the capital of Venezuela).   

43.605n This word is Indian. "Cacao" is derived from the Nahuatl word *cacahuatl*. The scientific name for cacao, *Theobroma cacao*, also includes a Greek term that translates to "food of the gods."  

[place] 43.606n Arabia Felix. The name Ptolemy gave to the south and southwest of Arabia because of its fertile landscape.

[place] 43.606n Constantinople. Present-day Istanbul.

43.606n eighty years. The "Errata" list at the end of *The Sugar-Cane* indicates that "eighty" should read "one hundred and fifty."  

44.611 well-fed. In Book IV, line 430, Grainger admits that planters did not always provide enslaved laborers with sufficient food for survival.  

44.616 glander-pest. Grainger is referring to the glanders, a contagious disease in horses.  

[people] 44.618 Celsus. Aulus Cornelius Celsus (14-37 CE), Roman medical writer and author of the encyclopedia entitled *Arte*, of which eight books, *De medicina*, deal with various medical topics from Greek medicine to first-century medical theory. Celsus is used here to refer more generally to a doctor.  

[plant] 44.625 tamarind-vista. The tamarind tree (*Tamarindus indica*) is probably native to tropical Africa and Madagascar. Its fruit pulp was used in food and beverages, including punch, and for medicinal purposes. 

[plant] 44.606n tea. *Camellia sinensis* is the species from which commercially produced tea is derived. Its native range is Southeastern Asia. Tea and coffee, as well as chocolate, were introduced to Europe as exotic beverages in the seventeenth century.

45.629 Lion. Refers to Leo, the fifth sign of the Zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-July and exits it in mid-August. 

46.642 zumbadores. Means buzzer in Spanish. As Grainger explains in his note, he is referring to the Andean condor (*Vultur gryphus*).  

[people] Advertisement. William Shenstone. William Shenstone (1714-1763), English poet and famed innovator of landscape gardening, which he practiced on his estate, The Leasowes. Grainger enclosed a draft of *The Sugar-Cane* in a 5 June 1762 letter to his friend Bishop Thomas Percy, asking him and Shenstone to read and comment on it. He added that "The second book you will see is addressed to our friend at the Leasowes; and I must tell you it is my favourite of the whole" (Nichols 279).  

53.5 For she, poor exile! The opening lines of Book II parallel Grainger's experience in the Caribbean. Having married into a planter family, he felt isolated from his London friends, and he hoped one day to have a plantation of his own, though he never did. Writing to his friend Bishop Thomas Percy on 29 February 1766, Grainger lamented that "I am lost, murdered, for want of company" (Nichols 293).

53.6 no circling mules press dulcet streams. Animals like mules, horses, and cattle were used to power sugar mills if wind and water were not readily available.

53.7 coppers. Copper pots used for boiling cane juice.  

53.9 Vulcan's aid. Roman god of fire. Here, Grainger refers to the use of fire in the process of distilling spirits (rum) from fermented molasses.

54.15 The Boreal morn. The aurora borealis or northern lights.

54.29 "O were my pipe as soft, my dittied song." Gilmore identifies this quotation as an adaptation from Milton's *Comus* (l.86).

55.35 monkey-nation. Monkeys are not indigenous to St. Kitts, but the vervet or African green monkey (*Cercopithecus aethiops*) had been introduced by the seventeenth century. Vervets most likely arrived in the Caribbean via slave ships from Africa. They quickly came to be considered pests because they established themselves in large numbers on the island and traveled around it in troops, raiding colonists' crops. Today, the St. Kitts vervet population exceeds the human one, and vervets are still known for destroying farmers' crops (and stealing tourists' cocktails). Controversially, many of the vervets are now killed or trapped to serve in medical experiments. 

55.38 gambols. Leaps or capers, as made in dancing or playing.  

55.41 thoughtless of to-morrow. Grainger warns that despite the fact that sugar plantations seem like sure investments with guaranteed profits, they nevertheless require expert knowledge and labor to succeed. He wrote *The Sugar-Cane* in part to provide this knowledge.

55.44 Indian crops. Sugar.  

55.46 droles. Also droll, a buffoon or jester. 

[place] 55.46 Liamuiga. Indigenous name for St. Kitts. 

[people] 55.46n Pere Labat. Jean Baptiste Labat (1663-1738), French missionary of the Dominican order who served as a priest and procurator in Martinique and Guadaloupe. Liberated the island of Martinique from British control in 1703. Later, a professor of philosophy and mathematics in Nancy, France, and author of the *Nouveau voyage aux isles de l'Amerique* (1722).

56.55 Gallic hosts. Hostile French forces. Here, Grainger makes an analogy between the vervet monkeys and the French during the Seven Years' War (1756-1763), the first truly global war that resulted in the establishment of Britain as the preeminent maritime and colonial power.    

56.59 Albion's martial sons. Albion, a name of ancient Celtic origin for Britain or England. The term may also derive from the Latin word for white (*albus*) and refer to the white cliffs of Dover.  

56.62 whisker'd vermine-race. Refers either to the black rat (*Rattus rattus*) or the brown rat (*Rattus norvegicus*), two Old World species of rats that arrived in the Caribbean with colonization and are now considered invasive species. This line of the poem also relates to one of the most famous and perhaps apocryphal stories about the reception and publication of *The Sugar-Cane*. In his *Life of Johnson*, James Boswell recalls a reading of a manuscript draft of the poem that took place at the home of painter Sir Joshua Reynolds. The line, "Now, Muse, let's sing of *rats*," is supposed to have caused the audience to burst into laughter. In response, Grainger deleted the word "rats" from the poem and replaced it with "whisker'd vermine-race" (Irlam 390-391).  

[people] 56.64n Durante, who was physician to Pope Sixtus Quintus. Castore Durante da Gualdo (1529-1590), botanist and physician to the Popes Gregory XIII and Sixtus V. Author of *Herbaria nuovo* (1585) and *Il tesoro della sanità* (1586).  

56.64n straps of cane-rats are publicly sold in the markets of Jamaica. Grainger may have been referring to a passage from Hans Sloane's *A Voyage to the Islands Madera, Barbados, Nieves, S. Christophers and Jamaica* (1707, 1725) that reads, "Rats are likewise sold by the dozen, and when they have been bred amongst the Sugar-Canes, are thought by some discerning people very delicious Victuals" (1.xx). Sloane seems to imply that all Jamaicans, and not just the enslaved, ate rats.  

[plant] 57.69 mangrove-banks. Mangroves are trees of the genus *Rhizophora*, which contains well over a hundred species, most native to the Old World but some native to the New. Mangroves can thrive in soils of varying levels of salinity and have colonized tropical and subtropical coastlines to form forests and thickets there. 

[place] 57.69 Guayaquil. Gulf and river in Ecuador leading to the city of Guayaquil. The modern name of the river is the Rio Guayas.

57.72 gallinazo. The American black vulture (*Coragyps atratus*), whose native range includes North, Central, and South America. 

57.54 alligators. The American alligator, *Alligator mississippiensis*.  

57.75 Ibbos. Igbo refers to a language spoken in the Bight of Biafra (now the Bight of Bonny), a bay on the western Atlantic coast of Africa bounded by Nigeria, Cameroon, Equatorial Guinea, and northwestern Gabon. The Bight of Biafra was a major slave-trading region in the sixteenth through nineteenth centuries, and people who spoke Igbo came to be designated as Igbo by slave traders and planters. Some of these people may have thought of themselves as Igbo as well, while others may simply have accepted or been forced to accept the term as a designation, even though they would have identified themselves by their villages or districts of origin instead. Since many people who ended up at the Bight of Biafra and other ports on the western Atlantic coast had made long journeys from inland Africa and picked up various languages along the way, those who identified as Igbo also may have learned Igbo during the process and been participating in ethnogenesis (the formation and development of ethnic groupings).  

[people] 57.74n Ulloa. Antonio de Ulloa y de la Torre-Giral (1716-1795) was a colonel and naval officer of the Spanish navy, as well as an explorer and scientist. He participated in a geodesic mission to the equator in Peru to measure the earth's true shape. After the mission was completed, Ulloa co-authored with Jorge Juan the *Relación histórica del viage a la América meridional* (1748).  
 
58.83 Misnian arsenic. A chemical compound used as rat poison.  

[plant] 58.84 cassada. Cassava (*Manihot esculenta*), also known as manioc, yuca, and bitter cassava, is a plant that is poisonous to human beings in raw form: its roots contain cyanide. Rats apparently could eat it without being unduly affected, however, Grainger recommends mixing cassava with Misnian arsenic to poison them. In fact, rats are recognized as major cassava pests today. In spite of their toxicity, cassava roots served as one of the most important food sources for Amerindians during the precolonial era, and they were subsequently adopted by Africans and Europeans in the Caribbean as well. The poison in the roots can be neutralized by proper processing: Amerindians and other early Caribbean consumers usually prepared cassava root by grating it and then pressing the poisonous juice out of it to make a flour, which could be eaten as a porridge or turned into various cakes or breads. Cassava's advantages are significant enough that they offset its toxic nature: it can grow in poor soils and conditions, one planting produces several harvests, and the roots can be stored in the ground for a long time without spoiling (Higman 61-69).  

58.87 unweeting. Unwitting, ignorant.  

58.88 cates. Choice foods, viands, or delicacies.  

[plant] 59.95 nightshade's juice. Nightshade most likely refers to *Atropa belladonna*, a poisonous plant also known as deadly nightshade or belladonna. The foliage, fruits, and roots are all highly toxic, and consuming only ten berries can kill an adult human. Its native range is England to central and southern Europe to Iran.  

59.104 thy little gang. Enslaved children. Almost all enslaved persons on the plantation were forced to work, including the young. The tasks children were assigned included weeding, cutting grass to feed the cattle, washing clothes, and serving in the main house.  

59.107 rich manure. Compost.  

[people] 59.95n Newman's Chemistry published by Dr. Lewis. William Lewis (bap. 1708-d. 1781) was an English physician and experimental chemist. Author of *Chemical Works of Caspar Neumann, M.D.* (1759). Neumann (1683-1737) was a German chemist.  

[place] 59.95n East-India. The whole of Southeast Asia to the east of and including India.  

59.95n Mungoes. The mongoose refers to a small carnivore and member of the family *Herpestidae*. There are many different species of mongoose, all native to the Old World. The mongoose was purposefully introduced to the Caribbean and Pacific islands in the late twentieth century to exterminate the rat population. Because the mongoose also eats birds, amphibians, and reptiles, it has contributed to the destruction of local biodiversity on those islands and is considered an invasive species.  

[plant] 60.114 yellow thistle. Most likely *Argemone mexicana*, the seeds of which are purgative. Also known as the Mexican prickly poppy; native to the tropical Americas.  

60.116 mountain-dove. May refer to the Zenaida dove (*Zenaida aurita*), a bird native to the Caribbean. 

[plant] 60.119 knotted grass. Probably *Spigelia anthelmia*, a plant known for its ability to rid the body of intestinal parasites, including tapeworms. Its native range is the tropical and subtropical Americas.   

60.120 endemial ill. An endemic disease, meaning one that is habitually prevalent in a certain country or locale.  

[plant] 60.123 cow-itch. Cowitch (*Mucuna pruriens*), a viny plant that produces severe itching after contact with skin. Was used on sugar plantations as compost, forage, and cattle feed. Its seeds destroy intestinal parasites. Likely native to tropical Asia and possibly Africa.  

60.114n emetic. A medicine that excites vomiting.  

60.114n dysenteric. Having to do with dysentery or diarrhea.  

[plant] 60.114n ipecacuan. Ipecacuanha, an extract that induces vomiting and that comes from the plant *Carapichea ipecacuanha*, an herbal shrub whose native range is southeastern Nicaragua to Brazil.   

60.119n vermifuge. A substance having the power to expel worms from the intestines; an anthelmintic.

[plant] 60.123n English field-pea. *Pisum sativum*, also known as the English pea, garden pea, or green pea. Native to Eurasia.   

60.123n. melasses. Molasses, the thick, brown, uncrystallized syrup drained from raw sugar.  

60.123n *Setae*. Bristles.  

[plant] 61.128 chickweed. *Stellaria media*, a plant native to Europe.  

[plant] 61.129 And that, which coyly flies the astonish'd grasp. Grainger refers to the sensitive plant (*Mimosa pudica*), the leaves of which fold up when touched. It is native to the tropical Americas and became an object of fascination to European naturalists.  

[people] 61.130 Pontus' King. Mithridates (132-63 BCE) ruled Pontus in modern-day Turkey from 120-63 BCE. His attempts to expand his empire led to three wars against the Roman army. Following a mutiny by his troops, he committed suicide.  

61.131 Median climes. Media was the location of hot springs that the Romans called the sacred waters of Hercules.  

[plant] 61.128n Snakeweed. May be *Euphorbia hyssopifolia*, a plant whose native range is the tropical and subtropical Americas.  

61.130n *Mithridatium*. A medicine long believed to be a universal antidote to poison.  

[people] 61.130n Pliny. Gaius Plinius Secundus or Pliny the Elder (23-79 AD), author of *Historia Naturalis*.  

61.130n electuary. Medicine in the form of a paste or preserve.  

[people] 62.132 Maro. Virgil or Publius Vergilius Maro (70-19 BCE), author of the *Eclogues*, the *Georgics*, and the *Aeneid*.

62.140 Halcyons. Mythical birds usually identified with kingfishers (genus *Halcyon*) that were believed to calm the seas in order to breed in floating nests. The phrase "Halcyon days" previously designated a fourteen-day period around the winter solstice that supposedly was the time when the ocean was becalmed by the birds. It now designates more generally a period of time in the past that was idyllic and peaceful.  

62.141 poison'd fish. Grainger is probably not referring to a specific species of fish but rather to ciguatera, a disease long associated with the consumption of predatory fish in the Caribbean. Ciguatera is a toxin produced by a marine microalgae called *Gambierdiscus toxicus*, and, like mercury, it becomes more concentrated in fish as they rise in the food chain. Symptoms of ciguatera include nausea, vomiting, and tingling fingers or toes. Symptoms usually go away in days or weeks but can last for years.  

[plant] 62.148 vervain. Also known as verbena (*Verbena officinalis*), an herbal shrub whose native range is the Old World and Australia.  

[plant] 62.148 wild liquorice. *Abrus precatorius*, a slender, viny plant that produces scarlet, pea-sized seeds with small black spots at the points of attachment. The seeds are known as jumbee beads, while the plant is sometimes known as the rosary pea. The seeds are commonly used to make jewelry, and they have been associated with the practice of obeah, perhaps because the black spots on the seeds resemble eyes. The seeds also may have been used to heal or poison, since they contain the toxin abrin, which can induce nausea, vomiting, abdominal cramping, diarrhea, and dehydration. *Abrus precatorius* is native to Africa, Asia, Malesia, Australia, and the Pacific region.  

62.149n *Donum Dei*. Gift of god. 

[plant] 62.149n rhubarb. *Rheum rhabarbarum*, a plant whose native range includes southern Siberia and northern and central China. Traditionally used for indigestion and bowel complaints; now commonly used as a fruit.  
  
[place] 63.150. Volga's wave. The Volga is a river in western Russia that connects to the Baltic, Moscow, and Black Seas before flowing into the Caspian Sea.  

63.156. insect-tribe. Locusts, one of several species of acridids (family Acrididae) that are known for swarming and migrating and causing great damage to crops.    

63.168 yellow fly. May be *Diachlorus ferrugatus*, a small biting fly native to Central America and the southeastern United States. 

63.171. cochinille. The cochineal insect (*Dactylopius coccus*) is the source of a highly prized red dye made from the dried bodies of the female. The cochineal insect is native to tropical and subtropical Mexico and South America and was used in those places in the precolonial era to dye textiles and other objects. It became an important Atlantic commodity in the eighteenth century, with most of the supply still coming from indigenous sources. The red coats of British officers were dyed with cochineal.  

[plant] 64.172. Indian fig. Cactus plant of the genus *Opuntia*, some species of which served as food plants for the cochineal insect. There are over a hundred species of *Opuntia* distributed throughout the Americas. *Opuntia* are also known as prickly pear cacti or nopal, the pads and fruit of which are commonly consumed by human beings and animals as food. 

[people] 64.175. British Wolf. James Wolfe (1727-1759), English army officer. Like Grainger, he served in the Netherlands during the War of Austrian Succession (1740-1748) and during the Scottish Jacobite Rising of 1745. Appointed Major-General in North America in 1758, Wolfe is perhaps best known for defeating French general Louis-Joseph de Montcalm-Grozon, marquis de Montcalm, and the French army on the Plains of Abraham outside of Quebec city in September 1759. Wolfe was fatally wounded during the battle, but his victory brought an end to the Seven Years' War (1756-1763).  

[people] 64.176. George. George III (1738-1820), king of Britain from 1760 to 1820.  

64.179. paricides. Father killer. Here, Grainger refers to parasites—and perhaps puns on the similarities between "paracide" and "parasite"—that kill the plants on which they feed (in this case, the sugar cane). Grainger may be referring to the sugar cane borer (*Diatraea saccharalis*), a moth native to South and Central America whose larvae bore holes in sugar cane plants and do great damage on plantations.  

64.187. Augaean toil. Augeas, king of Elis, owned the stables that Hercules cleaned in the course of completing one of his twelve labors. Grainger is comparing the labor of washing every leaf in a cane field with the labors of Hercules, who cleaned the stables by redirecting the Alpheus and Peneus rivers through them.  

[people] 64.171n. Sir Hans Sloane's Natural History of Jamaica. Hans Sloane (1660-1753) was an Irish physician, naturalist, and collector who traveled to Jamaica in 1687 with Christopher Monck, second duke of Albemarle and newly appointed governor of Jamaica. During his stay in Jamaica, Sloane amassed an extensive collection of natural specimens, including plants, that later served as the basis for his natural history, *A voyage to the islands Madera, Barbados, Nieves, S. Christophers and Jamaica* (1707, 1725). Sloane also succeeded Isaac Newton as president of the Royal Society in 1727. Upon his death, he bequeathed his extensive collections, which he had made considerable additions to after returning from Jamaica, to the British nation. These served as the founding collections of the British Museum, the British Library, and the Natural History Museum in London. Sloane discusses the propagation of cochineal in his *Voyage* (2.208).  

[place] 65.197 men of Kent. Kent is a county in southeastern England.   

65.198 Eurus. In Greek mythology, the east wind.   

65.199 Boreas. In Greek mythology, the north wind. 

65.200 hop-grounds. According to Gilmore, Grainger refers in these lines to the arrival of the hop aphid or Damson hop aphid (*Phorodon humuli*) to Kentish hop fields. These flies traveled on the wind and caused great damage to crops.  

65.201 the blast. Gilmore identifies the blast as the disease that also has been called the black blight. It results from an infestation by the West Indian cane fly (*Saccharosydne saccharivora*).  

65.207 nonage. Period of immaturity.  

[place] 66.217 Virgin-isles. The Virgin Islands are a group of islands situated to the east of Puerto Rico and northwest of St. Kitts. Now divided into the British Virgin Islands and the US Virgin Islands.  

[plant] 66.218 plumb-tree. Plum tree, which could refer to any number of plants of the genus *Prunus*. Plum trees are distributed widely across Asia, Europe, Africa, and the Americas.  

66.225 gemmy. Gem-like, brilliant, glittering.  

66.229 the ants' republic. Ant colonies were often represented as model republics in early modern and eighteenth-century accounts because of their ability to work together for the collective good. For example, in his *True and Exact History of the Island of Barbados* (1657), Richard Ligon observed that he once put a pot filled with sugar in the middle of a larger dish of water to see whether the ants would be able to find and retrieve the sugar. As he reported, the ants began venturing into the water even though they could not swim, so that their dead bodies could form a bridge for the others to use to access the sugar. The ants thereby "neglect[ed] their lives for the good of the publique" (64).  

66.231 vicegerent. A person appointed by a king or other ruler to act in his place.  

[plant] 66.218n jessamine. Jasmine, plants of the genus *Jasminum* native to tropical and subtropical Eurasia, Australasia, and the Pacific islands. Valued for their scent.  

67.232. Rhea. Titan goddess who was the daughter of Gaia and the wife of her brother Kronos. The mother of the second generation of Greek gods, including Zeus, Hera, Demeter, Hades, Hestia, and Poseidon.  

67.233. Auster. Latin name for the south wind.  

67.231n trade-wind. The prevailing wind patterns that eighteenth-century navigators used to sail their ships around the world. In the North Atlantic, the trade winds blow westerly from the coast of Africa just above the equator to the Caribbean and northeasterly from Florida up the coast of North America and toward Europe. 

[people] 67.231n. Homer. Greek poet (8th-century BCE), author of the *Iliad* and the *Odyssey*.  

[place] 68.265. Cathäy. The name by which China was known to medieval Europe.   

69.271 hurricane. In a 5 June 1762 letter to his friend Bishop Thomas Percy, Grainger notes that he had almost finished writing *The Sugar-Cane* and that this set-piece on the hurricane was one of the last sections that needed to be completed: "You may remember I some time ago metioned my being engaged in a work of some length and difficulty. Lately I completed it, at least for the present, though no less than a Georgic, and in four books too. It is called the 'Cane Piece,' and was composed mostly in my rides to the different parts of the island to visit my patients. I now send you the whole; only as I have seen no hurricane, and have not yet had time to arrange my remarks on a fire by night in a cane field, those parts in the second book are incomplete" (Nichols 278).

69.273 welkin. Sky, firmament.  

[place] 69.278. AEtna. Etna, Europe's highest active volcano, located in Sicily.  

69.289 the unsteddy year. The Virgin names Virgo, the sixth sign of the zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-August and exits it in mid-September. Scorpio is the eight sign of the zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-October and exits it in mid-November. Libra is the seventh sign of the zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-September and exits it in mid-October. Together, these three periods denote peak hurricane season.  

69.290. dome. House.  

[plant] 70.294. royal palm-tree's airiest van. Van is a vantage, height, or summit. The royal palm (*Roystonea oleracea*) can reach forty meters in height and is native to the Lesser Antilles, northern South America, and Guatemala.  

70.299 louring. Scowling, angry-looking, gloomy.  
 
70.306 sapient. Knowledgeable.  

70. the pole. Polaris, the pole star or North Star.  

71.314-315 strange burs/Surround the stars. A bur or burr is a circle of light surrounding the moon or a star.  

71.322 engineries. Engines of war, artillery.  

71.327-328 "all the isle below is hush as death". According to Gilmore, an approximate quotation of "and the orb below/As hush as death" (Shakespeare, *Hamlet* 2.2.485-486).  

72.341 welkin. Sky.  

[people] 72.349 Theodorus. Perhaps the Samian architect active c. 550–520 BCE.  

72.353 main. The ocean.  

73.356 corruscations. Vibratory or quivering flashes of light; lightning.  

73.367-368 Europe and Asia's vegetable sons...die. Grainger refers to the unsuitability of some Old World plants to the tropical Caribbean climate. Europeans nevertheless transplanted as many familiar Old World plants as they could to the Caribbean and, in doing so, transformed its ecology. They transplanted animals and diseases as well. This transplantation process is now known as the Columbian Exchange and included the movement of plants, animals, and diseases in both directions across the Atlantic. If the reader consults footnotes about individual plants, it will become apparent how many of the plants Grainger mentions are not native to the Caribbean.  

74.375 sails hang idly. Refers to the doldrums, also called intertropical convergence zones, where prevailing (or trade) winds disappear and ships become immobile for days on end.

74.388 Acescent. Sour, acidic.  

74.392 Astonied. This is a typographical error that would be corrected to "astonish'd" in the 1766 London edition of the poem.  

74.392 Solfaterre. Volcano.  

74.392n alum. An astringent mineral salt.  

[plant] 75.398 coco. The coconut palm (*Cocos nucifera*), which is native to coastal areas of Melanesia and Southeast Asia. It has great powers of natural disperal since its nuts (the coconuts) can survive up to 120 days in seawater. Nevertheless, it is believed that Europeans introduced the coconut palm to the Caribbean in the sixteenth century.  

75.405 sea-disgorging womb. Grainger is describing a tsunami or tidal wave.  

76.427 Theana. From here to the end of Book 2, Grainger tells the fictional love story of Junio and Theana. The story itself is conventional, borrowing from Shakespeare's *Romeo and Juliet*, as well as the story of Inkle and Yarico, first told by Richard Ligon in *A True and Exact History of the Island of Barbados* (1657) and retold as a sentimental tale in Joseph Addison and Richard Steele's *The Spectator* (No. 11, March 13, 1711).  

76.429 His father sent him from these genial isles. It was common practice for planters to send their children to Britain for education. Many of the children who were sent there, however, never returned to the Caribbean.  

[place] 76.430 old Thames. The Thames river. Here, used to mean England.    

[place] 76.431 Green Eton. Eton, a prestigious English boarding school for boys founded in the fifteenth century.  

76.433 fam'd Isis. Egyptian goddess associated with agriculture and marriage. Isis was eventually apropriated into Greek and Roman mythology, becoming a common figure in eighteenth-century British poetry. In the context of these lines, Isis is used as a name for the Thames as it passes through Oxford.  

76.433 the Nine. The nine muses of art, literature, and science.  

[place] 77.438n Torrid Zone. A theoretical climatic zone lying between between the Tropic of Capricorn and the Tropic of Cancer; the tropics. The ancients believed that the torrid zone was uninhabitable. While the colonization of the Caribbean proved otherwise, many colonists, naturalists, and others in the eighteenth century continued to believe that the tropics could induce what they called degeneration or the degradation of their bodies and faculties. Furthermore, the fear of degeneration was intertwined with theories of geographic and racial difference, since it was usually argued that New World forms of nature, including human beings, were inferior to Old World ones and that Europeans hence would become inferior themselves by inhabiting the New World.  

77.438n arrack. Also arak, an alcohol distilled from the fermented sap of the coconut palm (*Cocos nucifera*).  

[place] 77.438n Oronoko. The Orinoco river, which passes through modern Colombia and Venezuala.  

[place] 77.438n Chili. Chile.  

[place] 77.438n Maldivy Islands. The Maldives archipelago, which is in the Indian Ocean. Now the Republic of Maldives.  

77.438n black sugar. Possibly jaggery, a coarse, dark brown sugar made by evaporation from the sap of various kinds of palm.  

77.438n strong water. Distilled liquor.  

[plant] 77.438n The coco. The coca plant, the source of cocaine. Two species of coca are now in cultivation: *Erythroxylum coca*, whose native range is western South America, and *Erythroxylum novogranatense*, whose native range is Colombia to northwestern Venezuela and Peru.  

[plant] 77.438n chocolate-tree. The cacao tree (*Theobroma cacao*), the seeds of which are made into chocolate. The cacao tree is native to Central and South America and has been cultivated by Amerindians for thousands of years. Europeans first encountered cacao in Mexico, where the Aztecs placed a high value on it: cacao was prepared into chocolate drinks that were consumed by the Aztec elite, as well as during religious rituals, and cacao seeds were used as currency and tribute. Cacao was first brought to the Caribbean by Spaniards, who established plantations to supply Europe with chocolate. Although some Europeans initially found the taste of chocolate off-putting (the Aztecs did not add sugar to their chocolate), it was being consumed in Europe in significant quantities by the seventeenth century.  

[plant] 78.441 sappadillas. The sapodilla (*Manilkara zapota*), also known as the nasebery or nispero, is a sour or tart fruit whose native range includes Central America, Mexico, and the Caribbean.  

[place] 78.445 Sheen's royal walks. Sheen is the old name for what is now the London borough of Richmond upon Thames. According to Gilmore, Sheen's royal walks probably refers to Richmond Park, a royal park.  

[people] 78.452 Percy. Bishop Thomas Percy (1729-1811). English cleric, writer, and translator. A friend and frequent correspondent of Grainger, best known for the *Reliques of Ancient English Poetry* (1765), published by James and Richard Dodsley, who also published *The Sugar-Cane*. Furthermore, the *Reliques* contains a poem by Grainger entitled "Bryan and Pereene. A West-Indian Ballad," a tragic love story whose theme mirrors that of the story of Junio and Theana.  

78.456 Hymen. Greek god of marriage.  

[place] 78.441n Antigua. One of the Leeward Islands; St. Kitts lies just to the west of it. Antigua was colonized by the English in 1632 and now forms part of the nation of Antigua and Barbuda. 

79.463 old Europe's letter'd climes. Educated or learned climes. In addition to describing the practice of Caribbean planters sending their children to Britain for their education, this moment refers to the "grand tour," during which individuals would complete their education by visiting mainland Europe's (and especially Italy's) cultural capitals.  

[place] 79.469 Gaul. France.  

79.469 Saturn's reign. A golden age in classical mythology.  

[place] 79.471 Ausonia's clime. Southern Italy.  

79.476 Medicean Venus. Also known as the Venus de' Medici, a first-century BCE marble sculpture of Venus. It was housed in the Villa Medici in Rome before being transferred to Florence in the late seventeenth century. The sculpture was widely admired across Western Europe.  

[place] 80.483 Albion. A name of ancient Celtic origin for Britain or England. The term may also derive from the Latin word for white (*albus*) and refer to the white cliffs of Dover.  

80.485 Po. Gilmore identifies the *Po* as the ship that Grainger traveled on to reach St. Kitts in 1759.  

[place] 80.487 Bay of Biscay. An inlet of the Atlantic Ocean to the west of France and the north of Spain; affected by strong currents and storms.  

[place] 80.488 Charente. River in southwest France that empties into the Bay of Biscay near Rochefort; the site of an important French naval base.  

[place] 80.498 Porto Santo. One of the Madeira Islands in the Atlantic Ocean; the other was Madeira. The Madeiras were a Portuguese colony and an important waystation for transatlantic voyages. Because sugar production began in the fifteenth century on Madeira, it became a model for sugar colonies in the Caribbean.   

81.500 sky. The "Errata" list at the end of *The Sugar-Cane* indicates that "sky" should read "air."  

81.503 yard-arm. Either end of the yard of a square-rigged ship. The yard is a spar slung across a mast to support and extend a square sail.  

81.504 Boneta. Atlantic Bonito (*Sarda sarda*). Fish related to the tuna and mackerel whose range extends from Norway to South Africa in the eastern Atlantic (including the Mediterranean and the Black Sea) and from Nova Scotia to the northern Gulf of Mexico in the western Atlantic.  

81.504 shark insnares. Sharks (clade Selachimorpha) were notorious for following slave ships across the Atlantic, since slavers threw those individuals who died during the voyage overboard. Slavers also used sharks to terrorize their captives and subdue rebellious behavior. For example, one captain facing the prospect of suicides among his captives decided to lower a woman into the water, where she was bitten in half (Rediker 40).  

81.506 nautilus...dances o'er the waves. The nautilus is the Portuguese man-of-war or man o' war (*Physalia physalis*), a highly toxic relative of the jellyfish. It is called the man-of-war for its resemblance to an eighteenth-century warship under full sail. Also, the "Errata" list for *The Sugar-Cane* indicates that lines 505 and 506 should read instead, "The fring'd urtica spreads her purple form/To catch the gale, and dances o'er the waves:".   

81.507 winged fishes. Flying fish, which are small fish of the *Exocoetidae* family that glide above the water to escape predators. The strongest fish can "fly" nearly 200 meters in one glide.  

81.508 dolphins. Refers to the dolphin fish, dorado, or mahi-mahi (*Coryphaena hippurus*), which is widespread in the Atlantic, Indian, and Pacific Oceans, as well as in the Mediterranean.  

[place] 81.504n Guinea. A region on the west coast of Africa that served as a center of the Atlantic slave trade. Roughly covered a geographic region that included parts of modern-day Sierra Leone, Liberia, Côte d'Ivoire, Ghana, Togo, Benin, Nigeria, and Cameroon. Not to be confused with the modern nation of Guinea on the western coast of Africa.  

81.505n *nautilus*. The "Errata" list at the end of *The Sugar-Cane* indicates that "nautilus" should read "urtica."  

81.507n Albacores. Albacore tuna (*Thunnus alalunga*), which is found in tropical and temperate waters of all the oceans, including the Mediterranean. Now a threatened species due to overfishing.  

81.507n Garayio. Perhaps the tropic bird (any seabird of the family Phaethontidae) or the frigate bird (any seabird of the family Fregatidae), both of which prey on flying fish.  

[place] 81.507n Barbadoes. One of the Lesser Antilles; colonized by the English in 1627. Gained independence in 1966.  

82.509 Tropic-bird. Although he uses the term tropic bird, Grainger means the frigate bird, which was famed for its wide wingspan and ability to remain airborne for weeks.  

82.520 aethereal Bolt. Lightning. 

82.527 courser. A swift horse, a racer.  

87.7 wide-cultured plains. Cultivated fields.  

88.12 eldest birth of Time. January.  

88.24 Dryads. Wood or tree nymphs in Greek mythology.  

[plant] 88.25 broad-leaf'd china. The china-root plant, *Smilax china*, which is valued for its medicinal properties. Its native range extends from China to Japan and the Philippines. Whether *Smilax china* grew in the eighteenth-century Caribbean is unclear. The genus *Smilax* contains approximately 350 species, which are sometimes difficult to distinguish from each other. Today, the species *Smilax viscifolia* is commonly known as "China root" in Jamaica.  

88.17n a giant, of that appellation, carrying our Saviour, in the form of a child. A reference to the legend that St. Christopher, whose name means "Christ carrier," once carried Jesus in the form of a child across a river.  

[plant] 88.25n sarsaparilla. Refers to various species of the genus *Smilax* native to Central and South America. Spanish conquistadors named it *zarzaparilla* and learned from indigenous peoples to use it as an antisyphilitic. Also used to flavor drinks, including root beer in the nineteenth century. Grainger may have been referring to the species *Smilax regelii*, known as "Jamaica sarsaparilla."  

[plant] 88.25n lignum vitae. The hard, dense wood of the guaiac tree (*Guaiacum officinale* or *Guaiacum sanctum*, both of which have native ranges that include the Caribbean). Lignum vitae ("wood of life") was used to treat a variety of diseases, including syphilis and yaws.  

89.30 January, Hail! The new year was generally considered crop time, a period of intense activity when cane was harvested, milled, and prepared for export.  

[people] 89.31 M * * * . Colonel Samuel Martin (1694/5-1776), Antiguan-born British plantation owner and author of *Essay upon Plantership*, which was first published in Antigua around 1750. Published in at least a dozen editions before the end of the eighteenth century, the *Essay* contained Martin's recommendations for plantation management and covered topics ranging from the regulation and management of enslaved labor to the planting and harvesting of cane. The *Essay* is written in prose, but it served as an important source for Grainger.  

89.33 spleen. Bad temper or a melancholy temperament.  

[place] 89.25n East-Indies. The whole of Southeast Asia to the east of and including India.  

89.25n gout. Metabolic arthritis, frequently in the joints of the large toe, resulting in painful inflammations caused by deposits of uric acid crystals.  

89.25n palsy. Paralysis of the skeletal muscles.  

89.25n sciatica. Irritation or inflammation of the sciatic nerve. Causes severe pain from the lower back to the legs.  

89.25n obstructions. Blocks in any tubular organ or structure, such as an intestinal bowel blockage, which causes vomiting, distension, and abdominal pain.  

89.38 sylvan school. Informal education provided by experience in nature or the wilderness, rather than in the classroom.

90.46 labour in a round revolves. Cane cultivation is a year-round affair that nevertheless has distinct rhythms, which arise from the fact that cane can take 15-24 months to mature.  

90.48 swains. A country or farm laborer, a shepherd. A key figure in georgic poetry.  

90.54 nor hand of malice. A reference to arson. Grainger does not specify who the arsonists might be, but this is one of the places where he hints at moments of enslaved resistance on Caribbean plantations.  

90.59 Palaemon's fate. Palaemon, also known as Melicertes, was a Greco-Roman sea-god. According to one legend, the goddess Juno killed Melicertes by boiling him in a cauldron; in another, Juno drove Ino, Melicertes' mother, and Melicertes mad, causing them to throw themselves into the Saronic Gulf, whereupon they were changed into marine deities. Ino became Leucothea, and Melicertes was renamed Palaemon.  

90.61 hydra. A mythic water snake whose multiple heads could regenerate if severed. Hercules killed the hydra as the second of his twelve Labors. The term also signifies a difficult task.  

91.81n Bagasse. The crushed stalks that are the byproduct of milling sugar-cane. Rich in cellulose, bagasse can be used as fuel to boil cane syrup and as cattle feed.  

92.92 sail-clad points. Windmill sails.

92.94 coppers. Copper pots used for boiling cane juice.

92.99 dare now deprive them of the luscious cane. In his *An Essay on the More Common West-India Diseases* (1764), Grainger writes that enslaved laborers "should not only be allowed to drink what quantity of the cane juice they think proper, but even obliged to drink it" during crop time (10). However, planters sometimes inflicted severe punishments when the enslaved ate or consumed sugar cane. For example, the eighteenth-century Jamaican planter Thomas Thistlewood punished an enslaved African named Egypt for eating sugarcane by whipping him and giving him "Derby's dose," a phrase Thsitlewood used to refer to the act of having one enslaved African defecate in another's mouth (Hall 73).  

92.103 wanes. A wane is a large open vehicle or wagon drawn by horses or oxen and used to carry heavy loads, especially of agricultural produce.

92.103 many a day, And many a night. Cane juice begins to spoil as soon as the plant is cut. As a result, planters preferred to run their mills and boiling houses 24 hours per day during crop time.  

92.107 AEthiop-brow. Aethiop and Aethiopia (also Ethiop and Ethiopian) were sometimes used by the Greeks and Romans to refer to a specific people and region of Africa, but Aethiop was used to designate a generically black African as well. Aethiopians also were referenced in a classical proverb about "washing the Aethiopian" or turning black skin white. The proverb and subsequent versions, which were widely circulated in the early modern period and eighteenth century, framed the task as impossible and hence were used in justifications of racial difference based on skin color.  

93.108 Phosphor. The morning star or the planet Venus when found in the sky before sunrise.  

93.112 yellow jointed canes. Sugar cane turns yellow when it is ripe.

93.118 eyes. Sugar-cane buds. To produce new sugar cane, sugar cane stalks with buds on them were planted in the ground.  

93.127 junks. A gathering of stems or stalks.  

[place][people] 94.131 Lincoln-plains...Lincoln...Dyer. John Dyer (1699-1757), Welsh painter and poet, author of the georgic poem *The Fleece* (1757), which Grainger reviewed in the *Monthly Review* (April 1757). Lincoln was a center of wool production, and the Lincoln longwool is a breed of sheep known for its copious and heavy white fleece.

94.135 impress upon their captive sides, their master's cypher. The practice of branding sheep. Alhough he does not make an explicit comparison between the treatment of animals and human beings, this passage recalls the fact that enslaved persons were branded with the marks of their enslavers. See Gilmore, who credits Tobias Döring with this insight.  

94.143 from such dire sounds. The sound of the whip cracking. This is one of several places in the poem where Grainger shrinks from the violence of plantation slavery.  

94.146 laughing, labouring, singing throng. Grainger refers here to the common practice of enslaved laborers singing while working in the cane fields. The songs were sung in part to help establish a rhythm and pace for the work being performed, and planters also saw them as helping to lighten the burden of the labor being performed. In short, they saw music and singing as making work more pleasant and thereby ensuring compliance with the regime of plantation discipline. At the same time, the songs sung during field work often seem to have contained coded or even overt criticisms of planters and plantation discipline. For example, the Gloucestershire Archives in Britain recently uncovered an eighteenth-century slave song from Barbados that contained the lyrics, "Massa buy me he won't killa me/Oh_ Massa buy me he won't killa me/Oh Massa buy me he won't kill a me/Oh 'for he kill me he ship me regular" (see "Song of slaves in Barbados" at https://www.gloucestershire.gov.uk/archives/learning-for-all/online-exhibitions/inhuman-traffic/). A recording of the song by the Christ Faith Tabernacle of Gloucester also highlights the song's minor key, which imbues it with a sorrowful and tragic dimension (see https://www.gloucestershire.gov.uk/media/2126/song_48_1mp3-15777.mp3).  

94.148 hind's blithe whistle. A hind is a farm servant or agricultural laborer.  

[place] 95.153 Annan's pastoral hills. The Annan is a river in Dumfries and Galloway, a unitary council area in southern Scotland near the border with England. During the 1332 Battle of Annan at the outset of the Second War of Scottish Independence (1332-1357), Sir Archibald Douglas attacked Edward Balliol and his army at Annan. Escaping just before being captured, Balliol is said to have fled naked to England.

95.160 Ceres. Italo-Roman goddess of growth and agriculture.  

95.162 sonorous bellows. Bagpipes.  

95.164 dog-star. The dog star is another name for Sirius, brightest star in the constellation Canis Major. Sirius rises in conjunction with the sun from July 3 to August 11, which are known as the "dog days" of summer.  

95.167 steel-cas'd cylinder. Grinders in sugar mills tended to be vertical cylinders that crushed cane stalks as they were turned.

95.168 off the member snapt. Milling cane was a dangerous activity, and it was not uncommon for enslaved millers to catch body parts between the rollers. Whether mills were powered by wind, water, or muscle, it was unlikely that the rollers could be stopped instantaneously. Instead, planters were encouraged to supply their mills with axes so that injured limbs could be cut off without delay.  

95.168n put out of the wind. To put a windmill "out of the wind" is to stop the mill by turning the sails so they no longer catch the wind.  

96.173 manumit. To free from slavery. Here, Grainger criticizes planters who manumit the enslaved who are too old or too injured to work. Implicit in this criticism is that such manumitted persons, though free, were abandoned to care for themselves.

[people] 96.168n Pere Labat. Jean Baptiste Labat (1663-1738), Dominican missionary who worked in Guadeloupe for several years and authored the *Nouveau voyage aux isles de l'Amerique* (1722).  

97.183 the least admixture. The contamination of good cane juice with spoiled juice.  

97.189 in huge casks steept. Grainger speaks of adding milled cane, which still contains residual sugar, to fermentation vats before sending them to compost.

97.191 Vulcan's aid. Vulcan, the Roman god of fire. Grainger refers to flame being used in the distillation of rum.

97.192 Amphitryte. Also Amphitrite, wife of Poseidon and a sea goddess. In his note, Grainger describes the benefit of adding seawater to rum during the distillation process.

97.196 Nepenthe. From Book 4 of Homer's *Odyssey*, Nepenthe was a drug that made Helen forget her sorrow.

97.197 Polydamna. Wife of Thone, an Egyptian king. In Homer's *Odyssey*, Polydamna gives Helen nepenthe.  

97.198 Jove. Alternate name for Jupiter, Roman god of thunder.

97.198 Helen. Said to be the most beautiful woman in Ancient Greece. Paris abducted her from King Menelaus, thus leading to the siege of Troy.

97.203 Less-bellying canvas. A sail designed so that it does not overfill with wind.  

[plant] 98.205 coco. The coconut palm (Cocos nucifera), which is native to coastal areas of Melanesia and Southeast Asia. It has great powers of natural disperal since its nuts (the coconuts) can survive up to 120 days in seawater. Nevertheless, it is believed that Europeans introduced the coconut palm to the Caribbean in the sixteenth century.  

98.209 "Informer of the planetary train." The informer is the sun, and the planetary train is the movement of the planets across the sky. Gilmore identifies the source of this quotation as James Thomson's *The Seasons* (1730).  

98.215 Lacquay. Lackey, footman.  

[place] 98.222 Antigua. One of the Leeward Islands; St. Kitts lies just to the west of it. Antigua was colonized by the English in 1632 and now forms part of the nation of Antigua and Barbuda.  

98.222n hogsheads. A hogshead was a large cask used to hold and ship sugar. One hogshead of sugar weighed about 1500 lbs.  

[place] 98.222n body-ponds. A watershed in Antigua.  

[place] 99.226 Tobago. An island located northeast of Trinidad and southeast of Grenada. Now part of the Republic of Trinidad and Tobago.  

[plant] 99.227 calaba. *Calophyllum antillanum* is a hardwood tree whose native range includes Central America and the Caribbean.   

99.229 cubit. An ancient measurement of length derived from the forearm, usually about 18-22 inches.  

[plant] 99.233-236 worm...British oak...The closer calaba. The naval shipworm (*Teredo navalis*) is a mollusc that burrows into underwater timbers on piers and ships. It was particularly destructive to the British or English oak (*Quercus robur*), which was long used in shipbuilding, including by the British navy. *Quercus robur* is native to Britain.  

99.238 bridge-tree. An adjustable beam that supports the spindle of the runner or upper stone in a grain mill.  

99.238 mortis'd. Mortised. To be fixed in or joined together closely and firmly.  

[place] 99.227n St. Croix. An island that now forms part of the US Virgin Islands.  

[place] 99.227n Crab island. Isla de Vieques, a part of Puerto Rico that lies immediately east of the main island.    

100.241 Capouces. Also capoose, capouse. Cone-shaped pivots upon which the rollers of the sugar mill turned.  

100.246 sweeps. Arms attached to and driving the central shaft of the mill.  

100.252 thro'. The "Errata" list at the end of *The Sugar-Cane* indicates that "thro'" should read "through."  

100.252 lead-lin'd spouts. Much of the plumbing involved in sugar production and distillation was made of (or lined with) lead. A common side effect of excessive rum consumption in the eighteenth century was lead poisoning, which often manifested in severe stomach aches (dry gripes or colic).  

100.253 depurated. To depurate is to free from impurities or to cleanse.  

100.255 muscovado. A dark brown, unrefined sugar that was typically the end product of the sugar-making process in the Caribbean. Often described as unrefined since it was usually processed further in Britain and lightened in color before being sold to consumers.  

100.256 staunchions. Also stanchion, an upright bar, stay, prop, or support.  

[people] 100.259n. Sir Walter Ralegh. Sir Walter Raleigh (1554-1618) was an English courtier during Queen Elizabeth I's reign, as well as an explorer and author who obtained a patent for and helped to organize the expeditions to Roanoke in 1585 and 1587. He set out for South America in 1595, exploring the Orinoco River in present-day Venezuela, and again in 1617 to search for the famed city of El Dorado. He was executed for treason in 1618. Raleigh is the author of *Discoverie of the Large, Rich, and Bewtiful Empyre of Guiana* (1596) and is associated with the introduction of tobacco to England.  

[people] 100.259n Sebastian Cabot. Sebastian Cabot (c. 1481/2–1557), Venetian navigator and cartographer who explored the north Atlantic and traveled down the northeastern coast of North America, perhaps as far south as Cape Hatteras, North Carolina, in 1508-1509. Also led an expedition in 1526 that was supposed to reach Asia but went no further than Brazil. Cabot's place of birth is unclear. Although generally acknowledged as Venice, it might also have been Bristol (late in life, Cabot himself claimed to have been born in Bristol).  

[people] 101.259n King Henry VII. Henry VII (1457-1509) was the first Tudor king of England. He succeeded Richard III, ending the Wars of the Roses, and was himself followed by his son, Henry VIII.

[place] 101.259n Egg-Harbour. Now a township in New Jersey.  

101.266 strowed. Past tense of strow or strew; to scatter or spread loosely.  

[people] 101.272 Machaon. Greek physician and son of Asclepius; god of healing.  

102.273 farcy. A disease of animals, especially of horses.  

102.273 tabid. Also tabetic. Wasted by disease, corrupted.  

102.274 cholic. Colic or painful stomach contractions.

102.278 Indesinent. Incessant.  

102.279 Naiads. Nymphs of springs, rivers, and lakes in Greek mythology.  

[place] 102.282 Karukera's. In 1759, as part of the Seven Years' War (1756-1763), British forces attacked and forced the surrender of the French colony of Guadeloupe.  

[place] 102.283 Matanina! boast of Albion's arms. The French colony of Martinique surrendered to British forces in February 1762.  

102.285 thro'. The "Errata" list at the end of *The Sugar-Cane* indicates that "thro'" should read "through."  

[place] 102.288 Liamuiga. Indigenous name for the island of St. Kitts.

[people] 102.289 Romney. According to Gilmore, refers to Robert Marsham, 2nd Baron Romney (1712-1793), who married Priscilla, the heiress of the St. Kitts planter Charles Pym.  

[place] 102.283n Havannah. Havana, the capital of Cuba, which the British took in 1762 during the Seven Years' War.  

103.304 palm of eloquence. Prize for speech. In the ancient Greek Olympics, winners were awarded palm fronds.

[place] 103.306-307 Kent...Gaul. Kent is a county in southeastern England facing France, which was part of the ancient region of Gaul.  

104.315 boilers. Working conditions in the boiling house were extremely difficult, and only the strongest of the enslaved were assigned there. Tasks included stoking the fires to boil the sugarcane juice and skimming or removing the impurities that rose to the top. Being a boiler was more than merely physical work, however: it also required considerable technical and practical knowledge about the process of sugar production and refinement, and enslavers depended heavily on their head refiners or boilers for good yields of sugar from their crops.  

104.318 Cancer. Cancer is the fourth sign of the zodiac; the sun enters it in mid-June and exits it in mid-July. Cancer is also a water sign and a cardinal sign of the zodiac that indicates a change of season.  

104.321 lave. To pour or ladle out.  

104.322 gelid. Cold.  

104.323 chemist. The roots of chemistry go back millenia, but modern chemistry came into being between the late seventeenth and late eighteenth centuries. When Grainger refers to a chemist, he does not mean a modern chemist but someone who is skilled in the art of mixing compounds. Sugar production depended on technical knowledge about the heating of sugar, as well as about the addition of catalysts and additional ingredients to the cane juice to rid it of impurities.  

105.334 dropsy. An accumulation of fluid in the soft tissue of the body. The modern term is edema (or oedema).  

105.334 pulmonic ails. Lung infections or diseases.  

105.340 perflation. Ventilation provided by air blowing through a space.  

105.343 experiment. Experience.  

105.345 mucilage. A viscous liquid made from plant material.  

105.347 essential salts. Eighteenth-century scientists studying the composition of plants posited that they contained essential salts or acids and minerals obtained by the crystallization of plant juices.  

106.352 acor. Acidic or sour substance.  

106.350n arrack. An alcoholic spirit distilled from fermented rice and molasses, to which is often added the fermented sap of the coconut palm (*Cocos nucifera*).  

106.350n it forthwith bursts it. The poison Grainger refers to is curare, an extract obtained from the bark of South American trees of the genera *Strychnos* and *Chondrodendron* that relaxes and paralyzes voluntary muscles. Curare's use as an arrow poison was reported by Europeans from their earliest encounters with Amerindians in South America.  

[people] 106.350n Ulloa and De la Condamine's account of the great river of Amazon. Antonio de Ulloa (1716-1795), a Spanish military officer, and Charles-Marie de La Condamine (1701-1774), a French scientist, participated in a geodesic mission to the equator in Peru to measure the earth's true shape. After the mission was completed, La Condamine published the *Relation abrégée d'un voyage fait dans l'intérieur de l'Amérique méridionale* (1745) and *Journal du voyage fait par ordre du roi a l’équateur* (1751). Ulloa co-authored with Jorge Juan the *Relación histórica del viage a la América meridional* (1748).    

[plant] 106.357n *Dumb Cane*. *Dieffenbachia seguine*. The dumb cane looks very similar to sugar cane, and colonists often would eat it, mistaking it for the sugar cane. The dumb cane contains a poisonous sap, however, that swells the tongues of those who consume it and prevents them from speaking for several hours. Its native range is the Caribbean and tropical South America.  

[people] 106.357n A physician, however, who wrote a short account of the diseases of Jamaica, in Charles II.'s time. Thomas Trapham, author of *A Discourse of the State of Health in the Island of Jamaica* (1679).  

[people] 106.307n Charles II. Charles II (1630-1685) was king of England, Scotland, and Ireland. Son of Charles I (1600–1649) and brother of James II (1633–1701). He became king after the rule of Oliver Cromwell and the restoration of the British monarchy in 1660.

106.357n alcalescent. Also alkalescent. Tending to become alkaline (having a pH greater than 7).  

[people] 107.359 Xantippe. Also Xanthippe. Wife of Socrates (5th–4th c. BCE), often described as bad tempered.  

107.361 cades. Casks or barrels.  

107.363 lime-stone thoroughly calcin’d. Limestone is a rock that yields lime when calcined or burnt. Lime was used in Grainger's time to refine sugar: when boiled with sugar, lime precipitated impurities.  

[place] 107.364. Bristol, Britannia's second mart and eye!. Bristol was located in the southwest of England and was one of England's most important sugar-refining cities in the eighteenth century. Although the initial steps of sugar production happened in the Caribbean, sugar was further refined in Britain before being sold to consumers there. Bristol became a center for sugar refining in part because it had ample supplies of limestone.  

107.366 "to thy waters only trust for fame." A line from William Whitehead's poem, "An Hymn to the Nymph of Bristol Spring" (1751).  

[place] 107.371 Avon's. Avon refers to the Bristol Avon, a river in southwest England. It is different from Shakespeare's Avon. Sugar houses or refineries lined the Avon in the eighteenth century, as access to water was crucial during the refining process.  

[place] 108.380 Sabrina. A poetic name for the River Severn, which is Britain's longest river and empties into the Bristol Channel.  

108.381 marble. A metamorphic rock formed by applying great heat and pressure to limestone.  

108.395 Danae. Daughter of King Acrisius of Argos and Queen Eurydice, also mother of Perseus by Zeus, who impregnated Danae in the form of a shower of gold.  

[place] 109.401 Bermuda's. Bermuda was colonized by the English in the early seventeenth century and is now an overseas territory of Britain in the north Atlantic.    

[people] 109.402 Waller's. Edmund Waller (1606-1687), English poet and politician and author of "The Battle of the Summer Islands" (1645), a mock-heroic set in Bermuda.  

[plant] 109.403 their cedars. The Bermuda cedar (*Juniperus bermudiana*). Endemic to Bermuda and used for building houses and other construction work. Also sustained a ship-building industry that denuded the island of most of its Bermuda cedars by the 1830s.  

109.417 trade-wind. The prevailing wind patterns that eighteenth-century navigators used to sail their ships around the world. In the North Atlantic, the trade winds blow westerly from the coast of Africa just above the equator to the Caribbean and northeasterly from Florida up the coast of North America and toward Europe. 

110.425 weighed. The "Errata" list at the end of *The Sugar-Cane* indicates that "weighed" should read "weigh'd."  

110.434 coction. Boiling, cooking.  

110.428n melasses. Also molasses, the thick, brown, uncrystallized syrup drained from raw sugar.  

111.441 noble wine. Could refer to a fermented but undistilled molasses drink; also could refer to rum.    

[place] 111.443 Ganges. Also Ganga, a river that flows through India and Bangladesh.  

112.457 fraudful. Grainger criticizes the French, whom he accuses of doctoring their sugar by adding sand to it.  

112.463 Avaro's. A mean-spirited, rich man who appears as a character in Richard Steele's *The Tatler* (1709-1711).  

[place] 112.476 Thame. The Thames, another major site for sugar refining in the eighteenth century.  

112.477 skimmings. The thick syrup or scum produced during the sugar-boiling step of refining.  

113.480 cates. Choice foods, viands, or delicacies.  

113.482 Baynard. Also bayard. A bay horse or mule.

114.500 toil a pleasure seems. The theme of pleasurable labor is central to the georgic. Here, Grainger's narrator experiences labor as pleasurable after he has drunk rum, which is an end product of enslaved labor.  

[place] 114.501 Marne. French tributary of the Seine that flows through the Champagne region in northeastern France. Wines have been made there since the Roman era, but most champagnes were still wines until the mid-nineteenth century, when sparkling wines became popular.

[place] 114.501 Tille. A river in Burgundy, a major wine-producing region in France.

[place] 114.503 Vigornian. Vigornian is the Latin name for Worcester, a center of cider production in England.

114.504 Pomona. Pomona, the Roman goddess of fruit.  

114.507 ebriety. State or habit of being intoxicated, drunk.  

[place] 114.508 Albion. Albion, a name of ancient Celtic origin for Britain or England. The term may also derive from the Latin word for white (*albus*) and refer to the white cliffs of Dover.  

[people] 114.509 Johnson. Samuel Johnson (1709-1784), one of the most important English writers of the eighteenth century. Works include a *Dictionary* (1755) of the English language, *Rasselas* (1759), *A Journey to the Western Isles of Scotland* (1775), and *The Lives of the Poets* (1779-1781). Johnson also was a prolific essayist, publishing a series of 208 essays entitled *The Rambler* (1750-1752). Johnson reviewed *The Sugar-Cane* in the *London Chronicle* (Jul 1764) and the *Critical Review* (Oct 1764). What Johnson actually thought of Grainger's poem is unclear. While both of his published reviews of the poem are largely positive, the later one in the *Critical Review* contains a rebuke of Grainger's depiction of the slave trade. For Johnson's rebuke, see the note for lines 72-118 (the lines that Johnson objected to).  

[people] 114.509 Percy. Bishop Thomas Percy (1729-1811). English cleric, writer, and translator. A friend and frequent correspondent of Grainger, best known for the *Reliques of Ancient English Poetry* (1765), published by James and Richard Dodsley, who also published *The Sugar-Cane*.

[people] 114.509 White. The identity of White was confusing to eighteenth-century readers. In a letter dated 9 May 1801, written to Thomas Percy by his friend Robert Anderson, the latter states that "[s]everal passages [in Grainger's poem] want illustration, which probably you can give," and he then asks, "Who is 'White'?" In his reply, Percy clarifies, "White, was Mr. James White a native of Edinburgh, who resided in London and taught the learned Languages viz. Latin and Greek to Grown Gentlemen whose Education had been neglected." Percy adds that White authored a translation of Aristophanes' *The Clouds* (1759) and a grammatical text entitled *The English Verb* (1761). White died circa 1811. See *The Percy Letters* 9.59, 9.67-68, 9.269.  

114.510 Calpe. Calpe refers to one of the Pillars of Hercules in Greek mythology, now known as the Rock of Gibraltar.  

114.514 Paeon. Paeon, the Greek god of healing, also known as Paean.  

[people] 114.510n Mrs. Lennox. Charlotte Lennox (1730/1731?-1804), British writer best known for the novel *The Female Quixote, or, The Adventures of Arabella* (1752). A close friend of Samuel Johnson.

115.519 rude lays. Unskilled or unrefined poetry.

[plant] 115.522 sand-box shade. The sandbox tree (*Hura crepitans*) gets its name from its seed pods, which, when dried, were used as sandboxes for blotting ink. Apart from being quite tall, the sandbox tree is peculiar for two other reasons: its leaves, bark, and sap are poisonous, and, when ripe, its seed pods open with loud, explosive sounds, flinging their seeds at speeds exceeding 100 mph. Its native range is the tropical Americas.  

115.531 reed-built huts. Dwellings of enslaved Africans.  

[plant] 115.533 With plantanes, with banana's bosom'd-deep. Plantains and bananas (family Musaceae) are closely related. Both also formed a part of the diets of the enslaved, but plantains were by far a more significant source of food than bananas. Grainger's description of plantain and banana trees growing around "reed-built huts" probably is meant to evoke the provision grounds and gardens that the enslaved often cultivated to provide for their daily subsistence. Wild species of plantain and banana originated from and were first cultivated in ancient Southeast Asia, but cultivated species reached Africa in prehistoric times. They were then introduced to Spain by the tenth century and the Canary Islands by the fifteenth. They subsequently were introduced to the Caribbean by the Spanish (Higman 134).  

115.522n emetic. A medicine that excites vomiting.  

[plant] 116.549 tamarinds. The tamarind tree (*Tamarindus indica*), which is probably native to tropical Africa and Madagascar. Its fruit pulp was used in food and beverages, including punch, and for medicinal purposes.  

[plant] 116.549 papaws. Papaws, better known as papaya (*Carica papaya*). Its native range is southern Mexico to Venezuela.  

116.549n sweet-meats. Preserved or candied fruits.  

116.549n intenerate. To make tender, soften.  

116.549n ringworms. Ringworm, or *tinea*, is the name given to a fungal infection of the skin, scalp, or nails that produces lesions in the shape of partial or complete rings. It spreads by direct contact or through infected materials.  

117.550 Iris. In Greco-Roman mythology, Iris was the daughter of the Titan Thaumas and the Oceanid Electra and sometimes cited as the wife of Zephyrus, the west wind. Her name in Greek means "rainbow." The goddess Juno took her to serve as her handmaid. 

117.555 Hesperian throats. "Hesperian throats" refers to the Hesperides, the daughters of Night and Erebus who guarded the tree of golden apples given by Hera to earth. They also were renowned for their singing. Because the tree was popularly located beyond the Atlas mountains at the western border of the Ocean, Hesperian also means western. When referring to a specific geographic location, it designates Italy or Spain.

117.556 vernal. Of the spring.

117.558 herald-lark. Larks are any of several small birds of the family Alaudidae. Renowned for their singing and mostly found in the Old World, larks are also conventionally associated with the dawn.  

117.562 Phoebus. Phoebus, an alternate name for the Greek god Apollo and used in contexts where Apollo is identified with the sun.  

117.549n anthelmintic. Anthelmintic (also anthelminthic, antihelminthic) drugs are used to expel or kill parasitic worms, especially intestinal ones.  

118.570 Deep, moral truths convey. By the time Grainger wrote *The Sugar-Cane*, there was a long-standing tradition in European literature of using insects to represent moral, religious, and philosophical ideas.  

118.573 mountain-dove. May refer to the Zenaida dove (*Zenaida aurita*), a bird native to the Caribbean.

118.578 Why will their sons, ungrateful, roam abroad? Grainger refers here either to the common practice of absentee plantership, in which plantation owners lived in Britain and managed their plantations from afar, or to the equally common practice of sending children of planters to Britain for education.  

118.585 Eclips'd by titles. Metropolitan British attitudes toward creoles was inevitably condescending, regardless of how wealthy planters were. Grainger himself looked down upon creoles when he lived in St. Kitts. Writing to his friend Bishop Thomas Percy on 5 June 1762, Grainger noted that "reading, I assure you, is the least part of a Creole's consideration. It is even happy if they can read at all; Spell few of them can; and when they take up a book, modern romance, magazines or newspapers are the extent of their lucubrations" (Nichols 278).

118.587 Bellona. Bellona, the Roman goddess of war. Once again, Grainger is referencing the Seven Years' War.

118.590 Taber. A one-handed snare drum often played as a military instrument.

[people] 119.596 man of Norfolk. George Townshend, first Marquess Townshend (1724-1807), an English politician and caricaturist who also had a distinguished military career, serving as second in command to Major-General James Wolfe in Canada during the Seven Years' War and then as overall commander after Wolfe's death during the campaign to take French-held Quebec, which surrendered to British forces in 1759.

[people][place] 119.600 Tyrtaeus gain'd of yore. Tyrtaeus was a Spartan poet of the mid-seventh century BCE who wrote about the Second Messenian War and exhorted Spartans to fight to the death for their city. Sparta was a powerful city-state in ancient Greece.  

[plant] 119.602 pine. The pineapple (*Ananas comosus*) originated in Central or South America. It was brought by Amerindians to the Caribbean (Higman 188).

[people] 119.604 Apicius. Apicius, a name used for several Roman connoisseurs of luxury but especially Marcus Gavius Apicius, a gourmet who lived during the reign of Tiberius (CE 14-37). He exhausted his fortune on feasts and committed suicide rather than economize.  

119.608 Jew-fish. Jew-fish, the Atlantic goliath grouper (*Epinephelus itajara*). A large sporting and food fish of warm coastal waters. Its range includes the Caribbean, the Atlantic, and the Pacific. Now a critically endangered species. Because it is not clear if the name "jewfish" invokes a history of anti-Semitic associations, it was officially changed in 2001 by the American Fisheries Society to "Atlantic goliath grouper."    

119.598 drive invasion from their native shore. Probably refers to a failed attempt in 1759 by French forces to invade Britain.  

119.608n king-fish. Also known as the king mackerel (*Scomberomorus cavalla*), which is found in the western Atlantic from Massachusetts to Brazil.  

120.610 The large, black, female moulting crab. *Gecarcinus ruricola*. One of several species of terrestrial or land crabs, the black land crab lives in damp and shaded forest areas inland and migrates in large numbers to the sea to breed. It is one of the most commonly exploited land crabs for human consumption in the Caribbean. Eighteenth-century observers were often fascinated by the mass migration of land crabs.  

[place] 120.611 Cambria's. Cambria is the Latin name for Wales.  

[place] 120.612 Scotia's. Scotia is the Latin name for Scotland.  

[plant] 120.612 thyme. Plants of the genus *Thymus*, native to Greenland, Eurasia, and northeastern tropical Africa.    

[place] 120.613 Barbuda. A small island near Antigua and now part of the nation of Antigua and Barbuda.

[place] 120.614 Anguilla. Anguilla, the most northerly of the Leeward Islands.  

[place] 120.616 Lusitanian. Lusitania (now modern Portugal) was an ancient region of western Iberia inhabited by the Lusitani but also by other peoples, including Celtic tribes.  

[place] 120.617 Rhine. A major river that flows through Germany. Rieslings are the best-known Rhenish wines.

120.619 Unnatural warfare! Refers to the Thirty Years' War (1618-1648), a series of wars that eventually enveloped most of continental Europe and included the Franco-Hapsburg War (1635-1648), which was fought in part along the Rhine.  

[people] 120.613n Colonel Christopher Codrington, for building a college in Barbadoes, and converting Negroes to the Christian religion. Christopher Codrington (1668-1710) was born in Barbados and belonged to the wealthy Codrington family, which owned sugar plantations in Antigua and Barbados and leased land in Barbuda. Codrington served as deputy-governor of Barbados and governor-general of the Leeward Islands. At his death in 1710, he bequeathed his Barbados plantations and a share of the island of Barbuda to the Society for the Propagation of the Gospel in Foreign Parts (SPG), an Anglican missionary organization that aimed to convert colonial inhabitants, including enslaved and free Africans, to Christianity. In 1745, the SPG opened Codrington College, which initially served only white colonists.  

120.614n the war preceding the last. The War of Austrian Succession (1740-1748), during which a French force unsuccessfully tried to invade Anguilla in 1745.  

121.637 "For naught is useless made." Gilmore identifies John Philips's *Cyder* as the source of this quotation. In these final lines of Book III, Grainger compares the Caribbean to Europe and enjoins scientists and natural philosophers to explore and learn about the New World's vast natural resources. As he does in his preface to the poem, he suggests that the pursuit of knowledge is a good in its own right and ought to take precedence over the more mundane pursuit of wealth.

125.1 Genius of Africk. Grainger is using the term "genius" in the sense of a supernatural being or guardian spirit associated with a place, institution, or thing. "Genius of Africk" thus means something like the spirit of Africa.  

125.2 castled elephant. The combination of an elephant and a castle (often with the castle on the elephant's back) is an old heraldic sign. Grainger may be calling on the image of Hannibal's elephants during the Second Punic War (218-201 BCE).  

[place] 125.4 Niger. The Niger river. One of Africa's largest rivers. Its source lies in modern Guinea, and it empties into the Atlantic Ocean in Nigeria.  

[plant] 125.6 Papaw. Papaws, better known as papaya (*Carica papaya*). Its native range is southern Mexico to Venezuela.  

[place] 125.9 Rio Grandê. Major estuary in modern Guinea-Bissau.  

[place] 125.9 Sanaga. Most likely the Senegal river, which empties into the Atlantic ocean at St. Louis on Senegal's northern border with Mauritania. There is a Sanaga river that empties into the Gulf of Guinea just south of Douala in modern Cameroon, but this appears to have been called the Cameroon or Camarones river prior to the mid-nineteenth century.  

125.11 brede. Braid.  

126.14 a muse that pities thy distressful state. Despite the fact that *The Sugar-Cane* is unequivocally pro-slavery, Grainger affects a tone of regret and sympathy for the enslaved in these opening lines of Book IV.  

126.16 wishes freedom to the race of man. By invoking a singular "race of man," Grainger seems to promote the theory of monogenesis. Supporters of monogenesis believed, in keeping with the creation story of Genesis, that all human beings had descended from a common ancestor. According to the alternate theory of polygenesis, different races represented different species, each descended from different ancestors. In the eighteenth century, the concept of polygenesis was often used to argue for the relative superiority and inferiority of races and to support slavery.  

[place] 126.21 Caribbe's. The Caribbean's.  

[place] 126.22 parch'd Libya's wilds. Not the modern nation of Libya but the Libyan desert in the eastern Sahara. Grainger uses "Lybia" and "Lybians" several times in Book IV of *The Sugar-Cane* to signify Africa and Africans.

126.23 bays. Laurel (bay leaf) crown, often associated with poetic achievement.

126.24 Sylvan bard. Literally, poet from the wilderness. Here Grainger seems to be referring to himself insofar as he was writing from the Caribbean rather than from metropolitan London.

[people] 126.25 Melvil. Robert Melville (1723-1809), Scottish army officer and colonial governor. Like Grainger, he studied medicine at the University of Edinburgh before joining the British army and fighting in the War of Austrian Succession (1740-1748). During the Seven Years' War (1756-1763), he fought in the Caribbean, becoming temporary governor of Guadeloupe after defeating the French and then governor of Grenada, Tobago, Dominica, St. Vincent, and the Grenadines in 1764. He was also the founder of the St. Vincent botanic garden, which became a major scientific research station later in the eighteenth century.  

126.28 Indian wreath. Grainger's invocation of an Indian wreath further makes the point that the poem is a product of the Caribbean.  

[plant] 126.31 myrtle. Myrtle (*Myrtus communis*) is an aromatic shrub native to the Mediterranean region and associated with Venus, the goddess of love.  

127.35 jetty. Jet black. Seventeenth- and eighteenth-century British writers often used the terms "jetty" or "jet" when describing what they saw as the idealized beauty of exceptional Africans. See, for example, Aphra Behn's *Oroonoko: Or, the Royal Slave* (1688), where the narrator describes Oroonoko as having skin of "perfect Ebony, or polish'd Jett" (Behn 13).  

127.38-39 In mind, and aptitude for useful toil,/The negroes differ: muse that difference sing. Grainger indicates that he is going to distinguish Africans by what he considers to be their different mental abilities and aptitudes for work. As such, he is taking on the perspective of the slave trader and/or buyer, who made judgments about Africans based on similar considerations.  

[place] 127.44 Congo's wide-extended plains. Kingdom in southwest Africa north of Angola and near the modern Republic of the Congo and the Democratic Republic of the Congo (DRC).  

[place] 127.45 long Zaire. Zaire or Congo river. The second longest river in Africa, it drains into the Atlantic Ocean on the coast of the DRC.  

127.51 mechanic art. Grainger recommends that enslaved persons from the Congo be assigned specific trades rather than being forced to work as field laborers.  

127.52 ductile. Malleable, flexible.  

128.58 art. The "Errata" list at the end of *The Sugar-Cane* indicates that "art" should read "want."  

[place] 128.62 Golden Coast. Term used by Europeans to define one of the four major trading region on the West African coast. Although it is difficult to establish the borders of these regions with exactitude, they included the Grain Coast (roughly corresponding to modern Sierra Leone and Liberia), the Ivory Coast (modern Côte d'Ivoire), the Gold Coast (modern Ghana), and the Slave Coast (modern Togo, Benin, and Nigeria). British slaving ships often made port on the Cape Verde islands off the coast of modern Senegal before sailing down the coast of Africa, trading goods along the way. Once they had rounded the Bight of Benin, they followed the equator past the island of Saint Thomas (São Tomé) and toward the Caribbean. It is important to note that people were enslaved and embarked from a much larger region than the region denominated by the Slave Coast (the region of embarkation ranged from at least Senegal to Angola).  

128.63 Papaws. Also Popo. Name of people from the region between Accra in modern Ghana and Ouidah in Benin.  

[place] 128.65 Volta. Volta river in Ghana, which empties into the Atlantic Ocean northeast of Accra.  

[place] 128.65 Rey. Likely the Rey (or Rio del Rey) estuary in modern Cameroon. It is not clear whether Grainger means a specific river within this estuarial system.  

128.71 oft by suicide. Suicide was prevalent in the Atlantic slave trade and occurred during various stages of the process of transportation. Europeans proposed various theories to explain these suicides. In particular, physicians like Grainger often suggested that suicide by the enslaved was caused by physical illness or by a disease known as fixed melancholy. European Christians considered suicide to be a sin (it was a breach of the sixth commandment forbidding murder), but their concern when it came to the enslaved was almost solely economic, as Grainger suggests in these and later lines.    

128.72 gang. Gang was the general term used to designate groups of enslaved persons.  

129.77 just proportion rise. Samuel Johnson (1709-1784), an acquaintance of Grainger and one of the most important writers of the eighteenth century, referred to this and the preceding three lines in a review of *The Sugar-Cane* that he published in the *Critical Review* (Oct 1764). While the review was largely positive, Johnson took issue with the fact that, here and in the stanzas that follow, Grainger is giving "instructions for the buying and choice" of the enslaved. As he further comments, "here we think that tenderness and humanity, with which the former part of the poem seems replete, is, in some measure, forgotten. The poet talks of this ungenerous commerce without the least appearance of detestation; but proceeds to direct these purchasers of their fellow-creatures with the same indifference that a groom would give instructions for chusing an horse" (276-277).  

129.82 Cormantee. Also Coromantin. Name given to Fanti people embarked at Fort Kormantse in the modern nation of Ghana. By the mid-eighteenth century, the name Cormantee was closely associated with warlike people who resisted enslavement, thus explaining Grainger's warning in these lines. Indeed, Grainger would have been familiar with Tacky's Revolt, a 1760 uprising led by Coromantins in Jamaica. The uprising, which occurred less than a year after Grainger arrived in St. Kitts, loomed large over the remainder of the century and led to a number of increasingly repressive laws. For more information about Tacky's Revolt, see http://revolt.axismaps.com/.  

129.88 poinard. Dagger. 

[plant] 129.90 tobacco. Tobacco (*Nicotiana tabacum*) is native to the Americas and was introduced to Africa in the 1500s.  

128.91 clayey tubes. Pipes.  

[plant] 129.94 rice, or yams, or lofty maize. Three major food crops in West Africa. While rice (*Oryza glaberrima*) and yams (one of many species of tuber within the *Dioscorea* genus) were native to the region, maize or corn (*Zea mays*) was not: maize's native range is Mexico and Guatemala. Maize was, however, introduced to Africa around 1500. Grainger could also be referring to Guinea corn (*Sorghum bicolor*), an important staple crop first cultivated in Africa thousands of years ago (Higman 222-232).  

[place] 130.99 Minnah. Elmina, a city on modern Ghana's Atlantic coast. It was the first European settlement in West Africa and a major stop on the routes of the Atlantic slave trade.  

130.102 Moco-nation. People from the region between Bonny Island and Calabar on the southeastern coast of modern Nigeria. On some historical maps, the Moco nation appears in the same region as the Igbo or Ebo people. The reference to suicide in this line ("they themselves destroy") matches a well-worn steroetype that the Igbo were especially liable to taking their lives.

130.103 worms. Grainger is referring to parasitic worms (helminths) that live in the digestive tracts of human beings and other animals. There are many such parasites, including tapeworms and roundworms. Worms were a major health concern in the eighteenth century, producing such physical effects as malnutrition and anemia, as well as cognitive problems.  

130.104 Mundingo. Mundingo, Mandingo, or Mandinka were people of the West African interior centering around the modern nation of Mali but also coming from Senegal, Guinea, and Côte D'Ivoire. With respect to religion, the Mandinka are most closely associated with Islam.  

130.106 learned leach. Physician.  

130.108 Phoebus. An alternate name for the Greek god Apollo and used in contexts where Apollo is identified with the sun. 

130.110 Elysium. Part of the Greek underworld reserved for heroes.  

[place] 130.113 Quanza. Cuanzo (or Kwanza) river in modern Angola. It drains into the Atlantic Ocean south of Luanda (known in the eighteenth century as Loango or Loando). This line refers to enslaved people from Angola, who were primarily enslaved by the Portuguese.  

130.119 Ethiop. Aethiop and Aethiopia (also Ethiop and Ethiopian) were sometimes used by the Greeks and Romans to refer to a specific people and region of Africa, but Aethiop was used to designate a generically black African as well. Aethiopians also were referenced in a classical proverb about "washing the Aethiopian" or turning black skin white. The proverb and subsequent versions, which were widely circulated in the early modern period and eighteenth century, framed the task as impossible and hence were used in justifications of racial difference based on skin color.  

130.121 Machaon. Greek physician and son of Asclepius, god of healing.  

[plant] 131.123-124 vervain...sempre-vive, Unload their bowels. Vervain (*Verbena officinalis*) is an herbal shrub whose native range is the Old World and Australia. The dried plant is used to make tea. Sempre-vive refers to the genus *Sempervivum* ("always living"), a group of plants native to Europe and parts of Asia. Gilmore notes that Grainger may not have been referring to European vervain but to *Aloe vera*, a plant highly valued for its medicinal properties and native to the Arabian Peninsula.  

131.127 white eagle; deadly foe to worms. Calomel or mercuric chloride. Medicine widely used in the eighteenth century for its laxative and purgative effects, also described here by Grainger as a vermifuge or drug used to eliminate parasitic worms from the body.

131.133 The novel gang. Enslaved Africans newly arrived in the Caribbean.  

[plant] 131.136 acajou. The cashew or cashewnut tree (*Anacardium occidentale*). Its native range is Trinidad to tropical South America. As Grainger and others note, the fruit of the cashew tree is caustic, and it was supposedly used by women as a chemical peel to remove freckles (Riddell 82-83).  

132.141 rheums. Mucous secretions from the eyes, nose, and mouth. Comparable perhaps to a head cold but often thought by eighteenth-century physicians to lead to further (and more serious) illnesses.  

132.141 dysenteric. Dysentery, a gastrointestinal disorder, remained a major public health concern throughout the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries.  

132.142 hydrops. An accumulation of fluid in the soft tissue of the body, more commonly known as dropsy. The modern term is edema (or oedema).  

132.146 turtle. Probably refers to the green turtle (*Chelonia mydas*), the only species of turtle indigenous to the Caribbean that has served as a significant food source for human beings.  

132.148. leprosy's infectious bane. A chronic condition affecting the skin and nerves, caused by the microorganism *Mycobacterium leprae*.  

132.150 swallow dirt. Geophagy or pica are the medical terms used for the practice of eating dirt. Eighteenth-century physicians and planters were fascinated with geophagy, which they believed to be a disorder that led to death. In certain instances, they posited that eating dirt was a means of committing suicide and thus a form of enslaved resistance.  

132.150 Chlorotic fair. Chlorosis (also called green sickness) was thought to be an illness that afflicted young women. It could be accompanied by a greenish hue and produce a desire to eat dirt.  

132.137n rhinds. The "Errata" list at the end of *The Sugar-Cane* indicates that "rhinds" should read "rinds."  

132.137n Gum-Arabic. Edible sap of some trees in the genus *Acacia*. Used as a binder or stabilizer in foods and medicines.  

[plant] 132.137n almond. *Prunus dulcis*, primarily native to western Asia.  

133.151 cates. Choice foods, viands, or delicacies.  

133.156 Paean. Greek god of healing.  

133.160 provender. Dried cattle feed (e.g., hay).  

133.159 Extremes are dangerous. Here, Grainger makes a specific recommendation about the "seasoning" of newly transported enslaved Africans. Seasoning was a term used during the eighteenth century to describe the process of acclimatization that it was believed all individuals went through when moving from one climate to another. Physicians believed that patients were more susceptible to illness and death in the weeks and months after they first arrived in new places. This observation was broadly true for those who were new to the Caribbean but not because there was something inherently harmful about its climate. Instead, travel across long distances often meant coming into contact with new and potentially fatal pathogens. Grainger recommends that enslaved Africans be seasoned for a year and be given easy versus strenuous labor, although such a practice would have been uncommon.  

133.163 conch. Family of marine molluscs best know for their large shells, which can be used as musical horns when properly blown.  

133.165 Nor, Negroe. This and the following forty lines are the only ones in the poem where the narrator addresses the enslaved directly. Despite this direct address, the passage is framed by a set of rhetorical questions that help the planter justify his actions to himself. The justifications that follow were standard to pro-slavery tracts.  

133.169 dark tartarean caves. Having to do with Tartarus, the part of the Greek underworld reserved for the wicked. Here, Grainger refers to the work of miners. Improved technology in the seventeenth century facilitated the construction of deeper coal mines in Scotland, where coal became a major domestic export. Deep mines, sometimes extending hundreds of feet into the earth, were necessary because the rising demand for coal quickly exhausted accessible deposits.  

[place] 134.178 Scotia. Scotland.  

134.179 fatal lead. Southwestern Scotland had produced lead since the Roman period. The Scottish Habeas Corpus Act of 1701 did not apply to those in servitude in the coal and lead mines of Scotland. As a result, they could be tied in serf-like bondage to employers by ancient custom. According to the terms of such bondage, they could be sold or leased with the undertaking of mining work and were counted as a part of employers' inventory. Also, vagabonds and their families could be seized and returned to work. Born in Scotland himself, Grainger was aware of this history, and this stanza deliberately compares enslaved Africans to Scottish miners to mitigate the violence of the African slave trade. It would not be until 1774 that an emancipation act forbade mine owners from accepting new servitudes and provided for the emancipation of existing workers who had served for a certain number of years. Only in 1799 were all miners legally freed.  

134.180 palsies. Paralysis of the skeletal muscles.  

[place] 134.181 the rocky Drave. A river in central Europe that forms the boundary between Croatia and Hungary. 

134.182 silver's fluent ore. Quicksilver or mercury, which was a major export of the region. Among the effects of continued exposure to mercury are palsies (line 180) and loss of teeth (line 193).  

134.185 Incas. The Incan Empire extended from modern Ecuador to Chile in the early sixteenth century, when Spanish conquistadors arrived and imposed colonial rule. In the fifteen lines that follow, Grainger relies on the trope of the Black Legend to suggest that the suffering of the Incas at the hands of the Spanish was far worse than anything experienced by enslaved persons working on British sugar plantations. In particular, the silver mines at Potosí in Upper Peru (modern Bolivia) drove Spanish settlement, and indigenous populations were subjected to the *encomienda* system, in which an *encomendero* accepted tribute and obligatory labor from natives in return for protection. In the early seventeenth century, this system gave way to a *corregimiento* system that established networks of provincial governors who managed the labor distribution and tributary arrangements. Enslaved Africans were also imported and put to work in mines when labor ran short and gradually surpassed the natives in population. Besides silver, gold deposits were found throughout the Andes from Venezuela to Chile, and European colonists greatly expanded the extant mining work of the indigenous Americans in scale.  

134.188 proud insulting tyrants. The Spanish conquistadors.  

135.204 your pleasing task. The georgic mode is invested in describing the benefits of healthful agricultural labor. It is entirely conventional to describe that labor as "pleasing," but here, *The Sugar-Cane* runs into its central ideological paradox: even as Grainger compares plantation slavery favorably to Scottish, Hungarian, and Incan mining, the fact remains that enslaved labor---and enslaved labor on sugar plantations in particular---was especially difficult and dangerous. The georgic convention thus appears highly stylized and even ridiculous.  

135.207 humours. Moods.  

136.211 let humanity prevail. From here to the end of *The Sugar-Cane*, Grainger settles on a strategy of amelioration for dealing with the problem of slavery. This strategy involves accepting the continuation of slavery as an institution but advocating for the humane treatment of the enslaved as an economically prudent measure. Note that his recommendations mirror the actions of Montano at the end of Book I.  

136.213 possest large fertile fields, and slaves. Slavery did exist in Africa, although it is clear that the Atlantic slave trade fundamentally altered how it was practiced and the number of people who experienced enslavement. Grainger's reference to slavery in Africa is a conventional move of pro-slavery writers, who invoked it in an attempt to justify and excuse slavery in American plantations.  

[place] 136.215 Indus. Indus, a river in southern Asia, rising in the Kailas mountain range in Tibet and flowing through India and Pakistan.  

136.229 these uninstructed swains. A country or farm laborer, a shepherd. The key figure in georgic poetry.  

136.232 Oh, did the tender muse possess. Grainger claims that he would abolish slavery if his poetry had the power to do so. The next ten lines contain the only explicitly abolitionist sentiments in the poem and would be quoted positively in later abolitionist tracts. See for example Nathaniel Appleton's *Considerations on Slavery* (1767).  

137.235 Tyrannic sway. An open acknowledgment of the tyranny of slavery. Note that tyranny, an increasingly discussed topic during the late eighteenth-century Age of Revolutions, appears several more times in Book IV.  

137.242 Servants, not slaves. Grainger claims that even after they were freed, formerly enslaved Africans would continue to work on sugar plantations by choice, but this sentiment was a pro-slavery fantasy that was not borne out by reality after emancipation.  

137.244 Say, shall the muse. The abrubt shift in tone marks Grainger's turn away from his abolitionist fantasy and toward a policy of amelioration, in which physicians like himself were to play a central role. Recall his words at the end of the preface: "I beg leave to be understood as a physician, and not as a poet." See also Steven Thomas' "Doctoring Ideology."  

137.246 worm. Guinea worm or the dragon worm (*Dracunculus medinensis*) is a parasitic nematode acquired by drinking water contaminated by the water flea (genus *Cyclops*), which carries the worm's larvae. The larvae break through the stomach lining and enter the bloodstream, growing to full size within a year. A pregnant female worm lives in connective tissues beneath the skin and eventually will release its larvae into a large blister, usually on the legs or arms. The worm's migration produces such symptoms as itching, giddiness, breathing difficulties, vomiting, and diarrhea. The worm may come out spontaneously with the released larvae, but treatment typically involves attaching the worm to the end of a stick and winding it slowly out of the opening in the skin over the course of several days (the "leaden cylinder" that Grainger mentions in line 252 refers to this form of treatment). A broken worm causes an extreme allergic reaction that can be fatal, and blisters on the skin may ulcerate and become infected, resulting in an abscess and the "annual lameness" of which Grainger warns in line 255. Today, the worm may also be treated through anthelmintics.  

137.255 Moor. Moor, a name for a native or inhabitant of Mauretania in North Africa (modern Morocco and Algeria versus Mauritania).  

138.256 dragon worm. *Dracunculus medinensis* (see note to line 246).  

138.257 fell, winged insects. Chigres, chiggers, or chegoes (*Tunga penetrans*), a flea indigenous to Central and South America. This parasitic insect embeds itself and lays its eggs in the flesh of human hosts. Like the Guinea worm, chegoes were both horrifying and fascinating to European observers, who described them in detail. One such important description occurs in Richard Ligon's *A True and Exact History of the Island of Barbados* (1657), where an enslaved indigenous woman named Yarico is praised for her skill in removing chegoes. This same Yarico became an important literary figure in the eighteenth century via the story of Inkle and Yarico, which was first told by Ligon himself and then retold as a sentimental tale in Richard Steele and Joseph Addison's *The Spectator* (No. 11, March 13, 1711).  

138.258 sable. Black.  

138.265 yaws. Yaws or *frambesia tropica* is an extremely contagious skin infection caused by the *Treponema pallidum* spirochete. Physicians associated it primarily with enslaved persons, although Europeans and creoles were also subject to infection. In its early stages, yaws produces skin lesions and ulcers, and it can become debilitating if left untreated for a period of years. By the late eighteenth century, Europeans began to associate severe cases of yaws with obeah men. For example, see Benjamin Moseley's *A Treatise on Sugar* (1799). For more on obeah men, see "Obeah" on this site.  

[plant] 138.268 The flowers of sulpher, and hard niccars. Flowers of sulphur refers to a light yellow, crystalline powder made by distilling sulphur. The knicker nut (*Guilandina bonduc*) is a flowering legume whose native range is the subtropical and tropical parts of the world.  

138.268n farinaceous. Consisting or made of flour or meal, starchy.

139.271 ichor. In Greek mythology, the ethereal fluid believed to have flowed through the veins of the gods. Here, Grainger means fluid from yaw lesions.

139.276 live-silver. Mercury (or quicksilver) when taken as mercuric chloride (calomel). An important purgative in eighteenth-century medicine. Could also cause excessive salivation.   

139.282 defoedations. The action of contaminating, polluting, or infecting something, especially the blood or skin. In this case, the periodic eruption of yaw sores.

[plant] 139.283 guaiac pods. Refers to *Guaiacum officinale* or *Guaiacum sanctum*, both of which have native ranges that include the Caribbean. In the eighteenth century, the guaiac tree also was known as lignum vitae ("wood of life") because it was used to treat a variety of diseases, including syphilis and yaws. Also widely believed to be an abortifacient. Both *Guaiacum officinale* and *Guaiacum sanctum* are now endangered due to overexploitation and habitat loss.

139.287 might not skill ingraft. Because yaws, like smallpox, seemed to infect a person only once in life, Grainger wonders whether inoculation might not be a good way to fight yaws. Popularized in Europe and the Americas as a treatment against smallpox in 1722, inoculation involved puncturing the skin of a healthy individual and deliberately infecting him or her with pustulent matter from a live smallpox sore. This procedure was extremely dangerous by modern standards because the virus was not attenuated and the inoculee came down with a case of smallpox. Inoculation nevertheless had a much lower rate of mortality than being infected by smallpox naturally.  

140.291 Proteus-like. In Greek mythology, Proteus, an old man and shepherd on the island of Pharos near Egypt, was able to shape-shift. The worms' ability to cause multiple maladies and symptoms is equated to Proteus's shape-shifting abilities.

140.296 Mania. Roman and Etruscan goddess of the dead who ruled the underworld with Mantus.  

140.300 Ague. An acute or high fever or a disease that causes such. Often used to refer to malaria.  

140.305 "melt with the minings of the hectic fire." Gilmore identifies this line as an adaption from John Armstrong's description of a lung infection in *The Art of Preserving Health* (1744).  

[plant] 140.309 cow-itch. Cowitch (*Mucuna pruriens*), a viny plant that produces severe itching after contact with skin. Was used on sugar plantations as compost, forage, and cattle feed. Its seeds destroy intestinal parasites. Likely native to tropical Asia and possibly Africa.  

140.310 melasses. Molasses, the thick, brown, uncrystallized syrup drained from raw sugar.  

[plant] 141.313 worm-grass. Gilmore suggests that this is knotted grass (*Spigelia anthelmia*), a plant known for its ability to rid the body of intestinal parasites, including tapeworms. Its native range is the tropical and subtropical Americas.  

[place] 141.317 Cornish mine. Places of tin deposits in Cornwall and the surrounding areas in western Britain. Grainger notes that tin acts as an effective vermifuge.

[place] 141.319 Tyrians. Inhabitants of Tyre, a town on the Mediterranean coast in southern Lebanon. It was a major Phoenician seaport for trade from 2000 BCE through the Roman period.

[place] 141.323 Attic's sterile land. Attica, the ancient district of east-central Greece, its chief city being Athens. Maritime trade far surpassed its agriculture.  

[people] 141.317n Strabo. Strabo (64 BCE-21 CE), Greek geographer and historian whose *Geography* outlined the countries and peoples of the Greco-Roman world under the reign of Augustus (27 BCE-14 CE).  

141.317n Κασσι τερον. The "Errata" list at the end of *The Sugar-Cane* indicates that "Κασσι τερον" should read "Κασσι?ερον."    

[place] 142.330 Enna. City and province in central Sicily and location of a Sicilian slave revolt (134-132 BCE).  

[place] 142.330 Belgian fens. Refers to the High Fens, a highland plateau in the eastern Belgian province of Liege.  

142.334 shake off the tyrannic yoke. The region Grainger refers to as the Belgian fens had been part of the Netherlands, which were under Spanish control from the sixteenth century until the War of Spanish Succession (1701-1714). After the Treaty of Utrecht (1713), the Spanish ceded the Netherlands to Charles VI of Austria.  

142.345 Sylvanus. Commonly spelled Silvanus, the Roman god of the countryside often associated with woodlands and agriculture.

142.346 Ceres. Italo-Roman goddess of growth and agriculture.  

[place] 143.353. white Albion. Albion, a name of ancient Celtic origin for Britain or England. The term may also derive from the Latin word for white (*albus*) and refer to the white cliffs of Dover.  

143.356. main. Main refers to the open sea. Here, Grainger refers to Britain as the ruler of the sea. See, for example, the eighteenth-century poem by James Thomson, "Rule, Britannia!"

143.359 Eurus. In Greek mythology, the east wind.

[people] 143.360. Columbus. Christopher Columbus (1451-1506), a Genoese-born explorer. The purpose of his famed 1492 voyage was to discover a western route to Asia. He set sight on the island of Guanahani (in the Bahamas) on October 12. Columbus completed four voyages to the Americas during his lifetime.  

[place] 143.363. Lusitania's. Lusitania (now modern Portugal) was an ancient region of western Iberia inhabited by the Lusitani but also by other peoples, including Celtic tribes.  

143.367 imaginary woes. Grainger suggests that the symptoms he lists in the following lines (moping, silence, solitude, loss of appetite) are not real and perhaps feigned. One should be cautious about diagnosing historical illnesses retrospectively, but these same symptoms would come to be described as "fixed melancholy" in the latter half of the eighteenth century. Often associated with longing for friends and family, fixed melancholy became a common diagnosis for the enslaved, and physicians expressed concern that the illness would lead to suicide.  

143.370 a conjurer's snake-mark'd staff hath struck!. This and the preceding five lines mark the beginning of Grainger's description of obeah, a complex of religious and medical practices designed to help the enslaved negotiate the hardships and demands of living and working on the plantation. By a conjurer, Grainger means an "obeah man" or obeah practitioner, who frequently were associated with snakes, lizards, and other creatures in colonial and European accounts. For more on obeah and how it was portrayed, see [internal] "Obeah" on this site.  

144.377 drowth. Dryness, thirst.  

144.382 sacred nine. The nine muses of art, literature, and science.  

[place] 144.370n Guinea. A region on the west coast of Africa that served as a center of the Atlantic slave trade. It included parts of modern-day Sierra Leone, Liberia, Côte d'Ivoire, Ghana, Togo, Benin, Nigeria, and Cameroon but is not to be confused with the modern nation of Guinea on the western coast of Africa.  

145.391 in a phial pour'd. In addition to referring to a set of practices and beliefs, "obeah" or "obi" also could refer to a charm that would protect or curse an individual. These charms were often made up of a combination of materials that were believed to have spiritual or sacred significance.  

145.406. Lucifer. Also known as Phosphorus. In Greek mythology, the bringer of morning light.  

146.407. rushy couch. A bed made from stiff and hollow plants.  

[plant] 146.410 broom-bush. Gilmore identifies the broom bush as possibly *Sida acuta*, a plant native to Central America with yellow flowers that open in the morning.  

[plant] 146.414 jalap, or marvel of Peru. *Mirabilis jalapa*. Also known as the four o'clock flower because its flowers open in the afternoon. Probably native to Mexico; used by the Aztecs as an ornamental. Sometimes believed to be native to the Peruvian Andes because it was exported from that region to Europe in the 1500s.  

[plant] 146.415 solanum. *Datura stramonium*, also known as fireweed or jimsonweed. Probably originated in the tropical regions of Central and South America.  

[people] 146.415n. Linnaeus...Dr. Stork. Carolus Linnaeus or Carl von Linné (1707-1778) was a Swedish naturalist who laid the foundations for modern taxonomy or the systematic classification of living organisms. He also established a system for naming organisms known as binomial nomenclature. Dr. Stork was Anton von Störck (1731-1803), a physician from Vienna known for his research on poisonous plants.  

147.430 Deny subsistence to their labouring slaves. Grainger addresses the fact that, in order to economize on costs, planters did not provide enslaved laborers with enough food. Likewise, they wanted to maximize the amount of fertile land was dedicated to sugar cane and therefore did not engage in the large-scale cultivation of provision crops. In addition to working full-time to produce sugar and other commodity crops, then, enslaved laborers were frequently required to cultivate provision grounds or gardens to supplement their diets. The lands allotted for provision grounds were generally rocky, mountainous plots with poor soil.  

[plant] 147.434 English beans, or Carolinian rice. Beans or peas, as they were often called in the Caribbean, were a major source of nutrition for the enslaved. English beans are also known as fava, broad, or horse beans (*Vicia faba*), which originated in Western Asia thousands of years ago and spread from there to Central Asia, Europe, and Africa. They were sometimes sent from England to the Caribbean to serve as provisions. They also formed part of the provisions of slave ships. The horse bean was not as central to the diets of the enslaved as other bean species, however, many of which were cultivated by the enslaved themselves. Rice also did not make up a major part of the diets of the enslaved in the Caribbean, but South Carolina was the major Atlantic exporter of the rice species known as *Oryza sativa*, which originated in Asia. There is also a species of rice indigenous to Africa known as *Oryza glaberrima*. Enslaved persons may occasionally have grown both *Oryza sativa* and *Oryza glaberrima* in their provision grounds and gardens.  

147.435 Iërne's beef, or Pensilvanian flour;. Iërne is a term for Ireland, which supplied Caribbean plantations with salted beef and other provisions. Beef also came from the North American colonies, as did flour. 

147.436 Newfoundland cod, or herrings from the main. The waters off the coast of Newfoundland in the North Atlantic constituted one of the major fisheries of the world for the Atlantic cod (*Gadus morhua*) in the eighteenth century. Planters imported cod for enslaved laborers, who needed protein, but they imported what came to be known as "West India cod," which was salted cod of the poorest quality. 

148.448 This let them cultivate, one day, each week. Enslaved laborers were generally required to go to their provision grounds one day per week to tend them. In certain colonies, however, an internal marketing system gradually emerged that may have encouraged some to spend extra time cultivating their provision grounds. For instance, in Jamaica, those who participated in the system were able to sell or trade their provisions for other goods and currency. They were also able to supplement the inadequate diet provided to them by planters, although those individuals who cultivated provision grounds did not enjoy, on average, better health or longer lifespans than those dependent primarily on imported rations. Still, the provision grounds did offer their cultivators some control over what they ate, as they were responsible for choosing what plants to cultivate, and, in limited cases, they also offered some degree of economic autonomy. They also laid the foundation for agricultural production in the British Caribbean in the years following emancipation. Eschewing the model of industrial agriculture represented by the plantation, the newly freed turned instead to small-scale farming.  

[plant] 148.449 And there raise yams. One of many species of tubers within the *Dioscorea* genus. One of the most important food crops for enslaved persons in the Caribbean. There are several reasons yams became important to Afro-Caribbean diets: yam crop yields are high, yams are easily stored, and they can be prepared in several different ways. Just as crucially, yams formed a part of West African diets long before the commencement of the slave trade. As a result, slave traders often shipped large quantities of yams on trans-Atlantic voyages to feed the people on board, and yams accompanied Africans to the Americas, where they were able to continue cultivating them. Although there is one South American species of yam (*Dioscorea trifida*) that was transplanted to the Caribbean by Amerindians and consumed by subsequent inhabitants of the region, more important species to the diets of the enslaved were *Dioscorea cayenensis*, which is native to West Africa, and *Dioscorea alata*, which is native to Southeast Asia but had been introduced to the west coast of Africa by the Portuguese and Spanish by the sixteenth century (Higman 72-81).  

[plant] 148.449 and there cassada's root. Cassava (*Manihot esculenta*), also known as manioc, yuca, and bitter cassava, was domesticated in South America thousands of years ago and then brought to the Caribbean islands by Amerindians. It was one of the most important food sources for Amerindians during the precolonial era and subsequently adopted by Africans and Europeans in the Caribbean as well, although it was not as important a food source as the yam. Nevertheless, it still appeared in provision grounds because it is an easy crop to cultivate: it can grow in poor soils and conditions, one planting produces several harvests, and the roots can be stored in the ground for a long time without spoiling. These advantages offset cassava's toxic nature: its roots, which are the parts of the plant prepared for consumption, contain cyanide, and the raw roots are poisonous to human beings. The poison can be neutralized by proper processing, however: Amerindians and other early Caribbean consumers usually prepared cassava root by grating it and then pressing the poisonous juice out of it to make a flour, which could be eaten as a porridge or turned into various cakes or breads (Higman 61-69).  

[plant] 148.454-455 There let angola's bloomy bush supply, For many a year, with wholesome pulse their board. Refers to the pigeon pea (*Cajanus cajan*). Pigeon pea is a drought-resistant crop that has historically been important for small-scale farmers in semi-arid areas. It was commonly grown in the provision grounds or gardens of the enslaved because it could survive without much water or attention. It is native to South Asia and was first domesticated in India. By 2000 BCE, it also was being cultivated in East Africa, from where it was brought to the Americas, most likely as a result of the slave trade.  

[plant] 148.456 bonavist. A species of bean (*Lablab purpureus*) whose native range includes the Cape Verde Islands, tropical and southern Africa, Madagascar, and India.

[people] 148.449n Ogilvy's America. John Ogilby's *America: being the latest, and most accurate description of the New World* (1671). Ogilby (1600-1676) was a Scottish publisher and geographer.   

[plant] 149.457-458 ochra...slimy pulp...help disdains. Okra (*Abelmoschus esculentus*) is probably native to Africa and was one of the most commonly cultivated plants in the provision grounds and gardens of the enslaved. It possesses a glutinous or slimy pulp that was used as a thickener in stews called pepper pots, one of the most popular dishes in the colonial Caribbean (Higman 174-175).  

[plant] 149.459-460 potatos...Sweet as the cane-juice is the root they bear. Grainger refers to sweet potatoes (*Ipomoea batatas*), which probably originated in Central America or northwestern South America.  

[plant] 149.461 eddas. Edda or eddo commonly referred to taro (*Colocasia esculenta*). It is also, however, sometimes referred to as yautia (*Xanthosoma sagittifolium*). Both plants produce roots that were commonly consumed by the enslaved because they were easy to cultivate and had a high yield. *Colocasia esculenta* originated in southeastern or southern Central Asia but was being cultivated in Africa by 100 CE. From there, it was brought to the Americas on slave ships, which stocked it as food. *Xanthosoma sagittifolium* has a native range extending from Costa Rica to tropical South America (Higman 82-86).  

[plant] 149.462 Indian cale, and foodful calaloo. The term "Indian cale" also can refer to the species *Colocasia esculenta* and *Xanthosoma sagittifolium*. Since the seventeenth century, "callaloo" has been used to refer to several different plants. Today, callaloo usually refers to *Amaranthus viridis*, a plant whose native range is the tropical Americas. What the various plants labeled callaloo had in common was the ability of their leaves to serve as edible greens. They are also weedy plants that can survive in a wide range of environments, including wastelands. They formed an important part of the diets of the enslaved, probably because they were a hardy and reliable source of food (Higman 100-107).  

[plant] 149.463 mint. Plants of the genus *Mentha*, distributed around the world.  

[plant] 149.463 thyme. Plants of the genus *Thymus*, whose native range extends from Greenland and temperate and subtropical Eurasia to northeastern tropical Africa.  

[plant] 149.463 balm. The name of various aromatic plants, particularly those of the genera *Melissa* and *Melittis*.  

149.456n papilionaceous. Butterfly-shaped.

149.459n The juice of each may be made into a pleasant cool drink; and, being distilled, yield an excellent spirit. Mobby or mobbie, an alcoholic drink made from the sweet potato. The origin of the drink's name is Carib.  

[plant] 149.462n mezamby. Gilmore identifies mezamby as probably *Cleome gynandra*, a plant whose native range is the tropical and subtropical Old World.  

[plant] 149.462n Jamaica prickle-weed. Might refer to *Amaranthus spinosus*, a plant sometimes known as prickly callaloo. Its native range is Mexico and the tropical Americas.   

149.462n esculent. Suitable for food, edible.  

[plant] 150.468 gold fruit mature. Grainger refers here to various citrus trees, which originated in Southeast Asia and spread from there to the Mediterranean and Spain. Christopher Columbus brought several citrus fruits to the Caribbean, including the lime (*Citrus aurantifolia*) and the citron (*Citrus medica*) (Higman 175).  

[plant] 150.469 cotton shrub. Commercial cotton (genus *Gossypium*) is produced from several different species, some of which are native to the Old World and others of which are native to the New World. 

[plant] 150.471 coffee. Coffee is made from the roasted seeds of the genus *Coffea*. *Coffea arabica*, the most widely cultivated species, is native to northeast tropical Africa.

[plant] 150.474 cocô. Another term for cacao. The cacao tree (*Theobroma cacao*) is the source of chocolate, which is made from the seeds of the cacao tree. Cacao is native to Central and South America and was first cultivated by Amerindians thousands of years ago. Europeans first encountered cacao in Mexico, where the Aztecs placed a high value on it: cacao was prepared into chocolate drinks that were consumed by the Aztec elite, as well as during religious rituals, and cacao seeds were used as currency and tribute. Cacao was first brought to the Caribbean by Spaniards, who established plantations to supply Europe with chocolate. Although some Europeans initially found the taste of chocolate off-putting (the Aztecs did not add sugar to their chocolate), it was being consumed in Europe in significant quantities by the seventeenth century.  

150.474 thy rich pods. Cacao trees produce large pods that contain the cacao seeds, also known as cacao beans or nuts.  

150.475 Tho' years, and heat, and moisture they require. Cacao trees take several years to produce pods that can be harvested.  

150.476 Ere the stone grind them to the food of health. Cacao seeds are ground up to produce chocolate, which was branded as early as the seventeenth century as a kind of miracle food that would give its consumers health and strength. For instance, see the title of Henry Stubbe's 1662 treatise on chocolate, entitled *The Indian Nectar*, which portrayed chocolate not only as a health food but also as an aphrodisiac. There were also reports from seventeenth-century Jamaica that sailors and others who had to perform hard labor consumed it regularly. It is possible that maroons living in the mountains of Jamaica consumed chocolate as a subsistence food, too (Hughes, *The American Physitian* 131).    

[plant] 150.478-479 And that kind sheltering tree, thy mother nam'd, With crimson flowerets prodigally grac'd;. Madre de Cacao (*Gliricidia sepium*). Its native range includes Mexico, Central America, and South America, and it is used as a shade tree for cacao and other plants.  

150.485 negro-fugitives. Runaway or escaped slaves.  

151.488 Indian gardens. Early colonial reports from the Caribbean describe flourishing Amerindian gardens. Amerindians generally practiced conuco or mound cultivation, in which various plants were intercropped or cultivated together in ecologically sustainable fashion.  

151.489 Phaeacia's isle. Scheria, the island that Odysseus arrives at after his shipwreck; home of the Phaeacians. Whether Scheria corresponds to a real place is unclear, however.  

151.492 Pomona's. Pomona was the Roman goddess of fruit.  

151.493 Flora's. Flora was the Roman goddess of springtime.  

[plant] 151.498 anana. The pineapple (*Ananas comosus*) originated in Central or South America. It was brought by Amerindians to the Caribbean (Higman 188).  

151.500 "Insuperable height of airiest shade". Gilmore identifies this quotation as an adaptation from Milton's *Paradise Lost*.  

151.501 umbrage. Shade.

[plant] 151.502 mammey. The mammee apple (*Mammea americana*) is a large fruit native to the Caribbean and northern South America.  

151.502n ratafia. An essence used as a flavouring for food and drink, typically extracted from almonds or the kernels of cherries, apricots, and peaches.  

151.502n. *Les apricots de St. Domingue*. The apricots of St. Domingue. St. Domingue was a French colony, renamed Haiti after a revolution carried out by enslaved and free Africans succeeded in overthrowing colonial rule in 1804.  

151.502n *l'eau de noiaux*, one of the best West-Indian cordials. L'eau de noiaux refers to an alcoholic drink made by infusing a spirit with ratafia. Noyaux is the French term for the kernels of stone fruits.  

151.502n aperient. Laxative.  

151.502n sweet-meats. Preserved or candied fruits.  

152.504 anthropophagi. A term used in the ancient and medieval periods to signify man-eaters. It is now much less used than the term cannibal, which Columbus invented to name the Carib peoples that he encountered in the Americas. Columbus suggested that the Caribs were "Caniba" or subjects of the Great Khan, whose lands he was hoping to find. He also suggested that the Caribs ate human flesh, although there is little to no evidence that they actually did.  

[plant] 152.512 tamarind...With those tart fruit the sweltering fever loves To quench his thirst, whose breezy umbrage soon Shades the pleas'd planter, shades his children long. The tamarind tree (*Tamarindicus indica*) is probably native to tropical Africa and Madagascar. Its fruit pulp was used in food and beverages, including punch, and for medicinal purposes.  

[plant] 152.513 cassia. Most likely *Cassia fistula*, commonly used as a purgative. It is most likely native to India and Sri Lanka, and its native range may also include other parts of South and Southeast Asia.  

[plant] 152.518 chirimoia. *Annona cherimola*, a fruit that originated in South America and is perhaps native to Ecuador.  

[plant] 152.502n The English commonly call it *Mammey-sapota*. There are two species of it, the sweet, and the tart. Mammee sapota (*Pouteria sapota*) is commonly confused with the mammee apple. It is a sweet fruit whose native range is Mexico and Central America. Another fruit commonly confused with both the mammee sapota and the mammee apple is the nasebery (*Manilkara zapota*), also known as the sapodilla or the nispero. It is a sour or tart fruit whose native range is Mexico, Central America, and the Caribbean (Higman 196-197). 

[plant] 153.523 palmeto. Grainger is referring to what he calls elsewhere the royal palm (*Roystonea oleracea*), which can reach forty meters in height and is native to the Lesser Antilles, northern South America, and Guatemala.

[people] 153.524 Jones or Wren. Inigo Jones (1573-1652) was an English architect and theatre designer. Christopher Wren (1632-1723) was an English architect, mathematician, and astronomer.  

[people] 153.525 Palladio. Andrea Palladio (1508-1580), an Italian architect.  

[plant] 153.527 wild fig-tree. Also known as the bearded fig or wild banyan tree (*Ficus citrifolia*). It is the national tree of Barbados, and its native range includes Florida and the tropical Americas.  

153.530 rood. A rod, a unit used for measuring land approximately 5 1/2 yards (5.03 meters) in length.  

[people] 153.523n Daniel Mathew, Esq. Mathew (1718-1777) was a cousin of Grainger's wife. Mathew's Cayon estate was in Saint Mary's parish on the western shore of St. Kitts.  

[place] 153.523n Temple of the Sun at Palmyra. Also known as the Temple of Bel in Palmyra, an ancient city in Syria. Destroyed in 2015 by the Islamic State in Iraq and Syria (ISIS).  

153.523n cortical part...durable laths for houses. Grainger is saying its bark can be used to make laths or strips of wood used in building.  

[plant] 154.534 anata. Also anatta, anatto, or annatto. Refers to *Bixa orellana*, a low, shrubby tree native to the tropical Americas that was used from precolonial times by indigenous peoples to produce a reddish-orange dye. They used the dye to paint their faces and bodies for ornamental purposes, as well as to protect from insects and the sun.  

[plant] 154.543 granadillas. The fruit of *Passiflora ligularis*, also known as the passion fruit. Its native range is Panama to Venezuela and Peru.  

154.534n apices. Apexes.  

[plant] 154.543n water-lemon, bell-apple, or honeysuckle. Different names for *Passiflora laurifolia*, a passion fruit relative whose native range is the Caribbean to northern and northeastern Brazil.  

154.534n viscid. Sticky, adhesive.  

155.549 Basons. Basins.

[plant] 155.558 coco. The coconut palm (*Cocos nucifera*), which is native to coastal areas of Melanesia and Southeast Asia. It has great powers of natural disperal since its nuts (the coconuts) can survive up to 120 days in seawater. Nevertheless, it is believed that Europeans introduced the coconut palm to the Caribbean in the sixteenth century.

[plant] 155.563 bay-grape. *Coccoloba uvifera*, a seaside plant whose native range is Florida to Peru and the Caribbean to northern South America.  

[plant] 156.567 Indian millet. Guinea corn (*Sorghum bicolor*). Often planted in the provision grounds of the enslaved and a key source of food, as indicated by an eighteenth-century song sung by the enslaved that declares, "Guinea Corn, I long to see you/Guinea Corn, I long to plant you/Guinea Corn, I long to mould you/Guinea Corn, I long to weed you...Guinea Corn, I long to eat you" (qtd. in Higman 231).  

[plant] 156.569 bananas. Bananas (family Musaceae) are closely related to plantains. Both formed a part of the diets of the enslaved, but plantains were by far a more significant source of food than bananas. Wild species of plantain and banana originated from and were first cultivated in ancient Southeast Asia, but cultivated species reached Africa in prehistoric times. They were then introduced to Spain by the tenth century and the Canary Islands by the fifteenth. They subsequently were introduced to the Caribbean by the Spanish (Higman 134).  

156.573 vans. Vantages, heights, summits.  

[plant] 156.567n maise...great or Indian-corn, that grows in the souther parts of North-America. Maize, great corn, and Indian corn are all different names for *Zea mays*.   

[plant] 156.567n turpentine tree. Likely *Bursera simaruba*, a tree whose native range is the Caribbean and Mexico to Brazil.   

156.580 naiad. Nymphs of springs, rivers, and lakes in Greek mythology.  

157.584 wild banshaw's melancholy sound. This stanza describes the dances that the enslaved participated in on days of rest and holidays. The banshaw is another name for the banjo, an instrument that originated in Africa and arrived with the enslaved in the Americas. There, it evolved, as did the music played on it, to become an integral part of Afro-Caribbean and African American musical cultures. European colonists in the early Caribbean were fascinated both by the banjo and the music and dancing of the enslaved. For example, Hans Sloane (1660-1753), a physician and naturalist who visited Jamaica in the seventeenth century, got someone to transcribe some of the songs that he heard. He included these transcriptions in *A voyage to the islands Madera, Barbados, Nieves, S. Christophers and Jamaica* (1707, 1725). These songs can be heard at www.musicalpassage.org, a site created by Laurent Dubois, David K. Garner, Mary Caton Lingold, and others. Although colonists may have understood the dances and music as entertainment, Dubois and others have argued that dance and music helped the enslaved create spaces of autonomy for themselves, as they moved and created sounds that hearkened back to the performance traditions of Africa.  

157.594 greensward. Grass-covered ground, turf.  

158.602-605 let not thou the drum their mirth inspire...vengeance they pursue. Various colonies throughout the Caribbean and North America outlawed the use of drums and horns, which had military uses in Africa and were believed to be capable of inciting rebellion among the enslaved. St. Kitts passed laws banning drum and horn use in 1711 and 1722.  

158.607 untimely hours. Planters were often concerned about the enslaved marrying across plantations, since they believed that such marriages would lead to lost time from work. They also believed that traveling between plantations would foster ideas of independence.  

[plant] 158.611 prickly vine. Probably the prickly withe (*Selenicereus triangularis*), a cactus native to the Caribbean that produces a fruit sometimes known as the strawberry pear.  

[plant] 158.611n Chili-strawberry. The Chilean strawberry (*Fragaria chiloensis*) is native to the Pacific Northwest but was probably spread by migratory birds to Hawaii and Chile, where indigenous peoples began cultivating it thousands of years ago. In the eighteenth century, the Chilean strawberry was brought to Europe, where it was crossed with the Virginia strawberry (*Fragaria virginiana*) to create today's commercial strawberry (*Fragaria x ananassa*).  

[plant] 159.613 candle-weed. *Senna alata*, also known today as the candle bush or king of the forest. Its native range is southwestern Mexico to the tropical Americas.  

159.615 moist Aquarius. Eleventh constellation of the zodiac, represented by a figure pouring water from a jar. The sun enters Aquarius in mid-January and exits it in mid-February.  

159.616 Wiltshire weaves. Wiltshire, a county in England, has been a center of the English weaving and woolen industry for nearly 4000 years.  

[people] 159.622 Gallic Lewis. Louis XIV (1638-1715), king of France from 1643-1715.  

159.625 rapine. The act or practice of seizing and taking away by force the property of others.  

159.626 chicane. A subterfuge, petty trick, or quibble.

159.627 Themis. Greek goddess of law and justice.

159.629 mild laws...tyrannic sway! Grainger is referring to the *Code noir*, a royal edict issued by Louis XIV in 1685. The *Code noir* contained sixty articles regulating the treatment of the enslaved in the French Caribbean. Although Grainger praises it as protecting the enslaved from abuse, other eighteenth-century observers condemned it as proving the inhumanity of the institution of slavery, since it still allowed masters to inflict harsh punishments on the enslaved and treat them as property.  

159.630 Albion. A name of ancient Celtic origin for Britain or England. The term may also derive from the Latin word for white (*albus*) and refer to the white cliffs of Dover.  

[plant] 159.613n narcissus. The genus *Narcissus* contains several species of plants with yellow flowers, including the daffodil.  

159.613n diuretic. A substance that promotes the excretion of urine.  

[place] 160.635 Thames. The Thames river. Compare the last fifty lines of the poem to the end of Alexander Pope's *Windsor Forest* (1713), a poem that celebrates Britain's history and culminates with the triumphal image of the Thames, symbolizing British commerce, spreading across the world, carrying peace and liberty with it.  

[place] 160.638 Plata. Rio de la Plata is an estuary formed by the confluence of the Uruguay and the Paraná rivers in South America.  

160.640 Delighted commerce. If commerce has been the implicit theme of *The Sugar-Cane*, here Grainger personifies it explicitly as the core of Britain's power.

161.658 Britannia, Neptune's favourite queen. A reference to Britain's status as the premier naval power during the eighteenth century. 

161.669 lacquaying winds. Winds that follow or serve.  

162.680 the Patriot King. Perhaps a reference to Henry St. Bolingbroke's *The Idea of a Patriot King* (1749), a treatise written for Frederick, Prince of Wales (1707-1751), on monarchy. It describes in idealized terms the policies and virtuous conduct of a patriot king waiting in the wings. The patriot king's accession was supposed to end political conflicts.  
